 "We now have 4-month-old mice that are not diabetic whereas they were before," he added.
 Dr. Ehud Ur, a professor of medicine at Dalhousie University in Halifax, N.S., and president of the Canadian Diabetes Association's clinical and scientific division, warned that research is still in its infancy.
 Like other experts, he is skeptical about the possibility of curing diabetes, noting that these results are not applicable to people who already have type 1 diabetes.
 On Monday, during a radio broadcast on Sveriges Radio, in Sweden, Sara Danius, permanent secretary of the Swedish Academy's Nobel Committee, publicly announced that the committee, unable to directly contact Bob Dylan about the 2016 Nobel Prize in Literature, had given up trying to reach him.
 Danius said: “At the moment, we are not doing anything. I have called and sent emails to his closest collaborator and I have received very friendly responses. For the moment, that is certainly enough.”
 Previously, Ring CEO Jamie Siminoff noted that he launched the company when the doorbell of his front door was not audible from his shop in his garage.
 He says he has designed a Wi-Fi doorbell.
 Mr. Siminoff said sales increased after his appearance in 2013 on Shark Tank, where the show’s panel of investors refused to finance the start-up.
 In late 2017, Siminoff appeared on the home shopping channel QVC.
 Ring also settled a lawsuit with a competing security company, ADT Corporation.
 Even though an experimental vaccine seems so far to be able to reduce the mortality rate of Ebola, no cure has yet been sufficiently effective to treat existing infection.
 Even though the administration of an antibody cocktail, ZMapp, had initially shown promising signs in the field, formal studies have shown that its ability to limit deaths did not live up to expectations.
 In the PALM trial, ZMapp served as a control, meaning that scientists used it as a baseline and compared it to the other three treatments.
 The American Gymnastics Federation supports the letter from the United States Olympic Committee and accepts the absolute necessity of the Olympic family to promote a safe environment for all our athletes.
 We agree with the USOC's statement that the interests of our athletes and clubs, as well as their sport, would be better served by moving forward and making meaningful changes within our organization rather than revoking accreditation.
 USA Gymnastics supports an independent investigation that could shed light on how the abuse of the proportion described so courageously by the survivors of Larry Nassar could go unnoticed for so long and adopts any necessary and appropriate change.
 USA Gymnastics and the USOC share the same goal: to make gymnastics, and other sports, as safe as possible so that athletes can pursue their dreams in a safe, positive and accountable environment.
 Throughout the 1960s, Brzezinski worked for John F. Kennedy as an advisor, then for the administration of Lyndon B. Johnson.
 During the 1976 primaries, he advised Carter on foreign policy, then was appointed National Security Advisor (NSA) from 1977 to 1981, succeeding Henry Kissinger.
 During his time at the NSA, he helped Carter to diplomatically resolve international issues such as the Camp David Accords, in 1978, the normalization of relations between the United States and China in the late 1970s, the Iranian Revolution and its aftermath such as the Iran hostage crisis, in 1979, and the Soviet invasion of Afghanistan, in 1979.
 The film, starring Ryan Gosling and Emma Stone, received nominations in all the major categories.
 Gosling and Stone were respectively nominated for Best Actor and Best Actress.
 Other nominations include best picture, best director, best cinematography, best costume design, best editing, best original music, best production design, best sound editing, best sound mixing and best original screenplay.
 Two songs from the film, Audition (The Fools Who Dream) and City of Stars, were nominated for Best Original Song. Lionsgate received 26 nominations — more than any other studio.
 Late Sunday, US President Donald Trump, in a statement made through the press secretary, announced that US troops would withdraw from Syria.
 The announcement came after Trump had a telephone conversation with Turkish President Recep Tayyip Erdoğan.
 Turkey would also take care of the custody of captured ISIS fighters that, according to the statement, European nations have refused to repatriate.
 This not only confirms that at least some dinosaurs had feathers, a theory already very widespread, but provides details that fossils can not usually provide, such as color and three-dimensional arrangement.
 Scientists say that the animal's plumage was brown on top and pale or carotenoid on the bottom.
 This discovery also allows us to better understand the evolution of feathers in birds.
 Since dinosaur feathers did not have a fully developed rachis, the central shaft of a feather, but showed other features of feathers – barbs and barbules – the researchers concluded that the rachis was probably an evolutionary development later than these other features.
 The structure of the feathers suggests that they were not used in flight but rather for regulation or temperature display. The researchers suggested that even though it is the tail of a young dinosaur, the sample shows adult plumage and not the down of a chick.
 The scientists point out that this is certainly the tail of a juvenile dinosaur, but the sample reveals a plumage belonging to an adult individual, and not to a young one.
 A car bomb exploded at the police headquarters in Gaziantep, Turkey, this morning, killing two police officers and wounding more than twenty others.
 The governor's office said that 19 of the injured were police officers.
 Police said they suspect a suspected Daesh (ISIS) militant as the suspect behind the attack.
 They found that the Sun operates on the same basic principles as other stars. The activity of all stars in the system is determined by their luminosity, their rotation, and nothing else.
 Brightness and rotation are used together to determine the Rossby number of a star, which is related to the plasma flow.
 As for magnetic inversions, the smaller the Rossby number, the less active the star.
 During his journey, Iwasaki had problems on many occasions.
 It was stolen by pirates, attacked in Tibet by a rabid dog, escaped a marriage in Nepal and was arrested in India.
 The 802.11n standard operates on both the 2.4 GHz and 5.0 GHz frequencies.
 This will allow backward compatibility with 802.11a, b and g, provided the station has two radios.
 The speeds of the Wi-Fi 802.11n standard are significantly faster than those of its predecessors, with a maximum theoretical throughput of 600 Mbit/s.
 Duvall, who is married and has two adult children, did not make a good impression on Miller, who was told the story.
 When asked to comment, Miller stated, “Mike talks a lot during the hearing… I was preparing, so I didn’t really hear what he was saying.”
 "We will strive to reduce carbon dioxide emissions per unit of GDP significantly by 2020 compared with the level in 2005," Hu said.
 He did not quantify these reductions, saying they will be based on Chinese economic output.
 Hu encouraged developing countries "to avoid the old method of first polluting and then cleaning up."
 He added, “However, we should not ask them to assume obligations that go beyond their stage of development, their responsibility and their capacities.”
 The Iraq Study Group presented its report today at 12 GMT.
 He warns that no one can guarantee that any action in Iraq at this stage will end sectarian war, rising violence or drift towards chaos.
 The report opens with a call for an open debate and consensus-building in the United States on policy towards the Middle East.
 The report is highly critical of almost every aspect of the current government's policy towards Iraq and strongly argues for an immediate change of direction.
 The first of its 78 recommendations is that a new diplomatic initiative should be taken before the end of the year to secure Iraq's borders against hostile interventions and to restore diplomatic relations with its neighbors.
 Current Senator and First Lady of Argentina Cristina Fernandez de Kirchner announced her presidential candidacy last night in La Plata, a city 50 kilometers (31 miles) south of Buenos Aires.
 Mrs Kirchner announced her intention to run for the presidency at the Argentine theatre, the same place where she began her 2005 campaign for the Senate as a member of the Buenos Aires delegation.
 The debate was sparked by the controversy over spending on relief and reconstruction following Hurricane Katrina; what some fiscal conservatives have humorously called the "Bush New Orleans Agreement."
 Liberal criticism of the reconstruction effort focused on the awarding of reconstruction contracts to people perceived as Washington insiders.
 More than 4,000,000 people came to Rome for the funeral.
 Due to the large number of people present, it was not possible for everyone to attend the funeral in St. Peter's Square.
 Several large television screens were set up in different places in Rome to allow people to watch the ceremony.
 In many other Italian cities and in the rest of the world, in particular in Poland, similar installations have been realized and have been seen by a large number of people.
 Historians have criticized the FBI's past policies for concentrating resources on easy-to-solve cases, particularly car thefts, with the intention of increasing the agency's success rate.
 Congress launched funding for the anti-pornography initiative during the 2005 fiscal year, while noting that the FBI was preparing to dedicate 10 agents to the fight against adult pornography.
 Robin Uthappa scored the highest score of the innings, 70 runs in just 41 balls, hitting 11 fours and 2 sixes.
 The middle order batsmen, Sachin Tendulkar and Rahul Dravid, got good runs and accomplished a century together.
 But after losing the post of his captain, India has only realized 36 races and lost seven posts until the end of the round.
 U.S. President George W. Bush arrived in Singapore on the morning of November 16, beginning a week-long tour of Asia.
 He was welcomed by Wong Kan Seng, Singapore's deputy prime minister, and discussed trade and terrorism with Lee Hsien Loong, Singapore's prime minister.
 After seven days of electoral defeats in mid-term elections, Bush announced his plan to expand trade in Asia.
 Prime Minister Stephen Harper has agreed to send the government's "clean air act" to a multi-party committee for review before its second reading, following a 25-minute meeting Tuesday with NDP Leader Jack Layton at the PMO.
 Layton had asked for changes to the Conservatives' environmental bill at the meeting with the prime minister, requesting a "complete and thorough re-write" of the Conservative party's environmental bill.
 And since then, the federal government has stepped in to fund the Mersey Hospital in Devonport, Tasmania, with the state government and some MPs calling the move a political stunt ahead of the November election.
 But Prime Minister John Howard said the law was only intended to prevent the hospital's facilities from being downgraded by the Tasmanian government, by giving it an extra A$45 million.
 According to the latest bulletin, sea level readings indicate that a tsunami has occurred. A specific tsunami event was recorded near Pago Pago and Niue.
 No major damage or injuries were reported in Tonga, but electricity was temporarily cut off, which would have prevented the Tongan authorities from receiving the tsunami warning issued by the Pacific Tsunami Warning Center.
 Fourteen Hawaii schools located on or near the coast were closed all day Wednesday despite the lifting of the alerts.
 US President George W. Bush welcomed the announcement.
 Bush spokesman Gordon Johndroe called the North Korean pledge "a major step toward the goal of verifiable denuclearization of the Korean peninsula."
 Subtropical Storm Jerry, the 10th named storm of the Atlantic hurricane season, has formed in the Atlantic Ocean.
 The National Hurricane Center (NHC) says at this stage, Jerry does not represent any threat to land.
 According to the U.S. Army Corps of Engineers, 6 inches of rain could open a breach in the previously damaged levees.
 The ninth district, which experienced flooding reaching 20 feet high during Hurricane Katrina, is currently under water up to the waist as the nearby levee has been breached.
 The water pours over the dike in a 100-foot section.
 In his speech on Wikinews last month, Commons director Adam Cuerden expressed his frustration at the deletions that had been made.
 "He [Wales] lied to us from the beginning, first by claiming legal reasons, then by pretending to listen to us until he deleted his work."
 Community discontent has led to current efforts to design a policy regarding the sexually explicit content of the site that hosts millions of freely accessible media.
 The work was mainly theoretical, but the program was written to simulate the observations made of the Sagittarius Galaxy.
 The effect the team was looking for would be caused by tidal forces between the black matter in the galaxy and the black matter in the Milky Way.
 Just as the moon exerts a pull on the earth, causing tides, the Milky Way exerts a force on the Sagittarius Galaxy.
 Scientists were able to conclude that dark matter affects other dark matter in the same way that normal matter affects normal matter.
 According to this theory, most of the dark matter around a galaxy is in a sort of halo, and is made up of a large number of small particles.
 Television reports show white smoke coming from the plant.
 Local authorities are warning residents to stay indoors, turn off air conditioners and not drink tap water.
 According to the Japanese nuclear agency, radioactive cesium and iodine have been identified at the plant.
 The authorities assume that this means that the uranium fuel reservoirs on the site have cracks and leaks.
 Dr Tony Moll discovered multi-drug resistant tuberculosis (MDR-TB) in the South African region of KwaZulu-Natal.
 "In an interview, he said the new mutation was "very disturbing and alarming because of the very high mortality rate."
 Some patients may have contracted the virus in the hospital, Dr. Moll said, and at least two of them were hospital staff.
 Over a one-year period, an infected person can infect 10 to 15 close contacts.
 However, the percentage of DR-TB in the overall TB group seems still low; 6,000 people out of a total of 330,000 were infected at some point in South Africa.
 The satellites, which weighed both more than 450 kg and moved at about 28000 km/h, collided at 790 km above the Earth.
 Scientists say the explosion caused by the collision was massive.
 We are still trying to determine the extent of the accident and how the Earth will be affected.
 The strategic command of the U.S. Department of Defense is tracking the debris.
 The result of the trace analysis will be published on a public website.
 A doctor working at the Children's Hospital of Pittsburgh, Pennsylvania, was charged with murder with aggravating circumstances after his mother was found dead in the trunk of her car on Wednesday, according to Ohio authorities.
 Dr Malar Balasubramanian, 29, was found lying on the ground by the side of the road in Blue Ash, Ohio, a suburb about 15 miles north of Cincinnati, wearing a T-shirt and underwear, and apparently heavily medicated.
 She directed the officers to her black Oldsmobile Intrigue, which was 500 feet away.
 There, they found the body of Saroja Balasubramanian, 53, covered in blood-stained blankets.
 Police said the body had apparently been there for about a day.
 The first cases of this seasonal disease were reported at the end of July.
 Pigs are carriers of the disease, which is then transmitted to humans by mosquitoes.
 The epidemic has prompted the Indian government to take measures such as deploying pig catchers in severely affected areas, distributing thousands of mosquito nets and spraying pesticides.
 Several million vaccine doses against encephalitis have also been promised by the government, which will help to prepare health agencies for next year.
 Delivery plans for vaccines in historically hard-hit areas this year have been delayed due to lack of funding and low priority given to these diseases over others.
 In 1956, Słania moved to Sweden, where three years later he began working for the Swedish Post, eventually becoming its chief engraver.
 He produced more than 1000 stamps for Sweden and 28 other countries.
 His work is of such quality and level of detail that he is one of the few well-known philatelists of the "general public". Some collectors devote their attention only to his works.
 His 1000th stamp was the magnificent “Great Deeds by Swedish Kings” by David Klöcker Ehrenstrahl in 2000, which is in the Guinness Book of Records.
 He has also engraved banknotes for many countries. Among the recent examples of his work are the portraits of the Prime Minister on the front of the new $5 and $100 Canadian banknotes.
 Following the accident, Gibson was transported to the hospital, but succumbed immediately after.
 The driver of the truck, 64, was not injured in the accident.
 The vehicle itself was removed from the scene of the accident at about 12:00 GMT the same day.
 An employee of a nearby garage said: "There were children trying to cross the road, and they were crying and screaming."
 They all ran back to the place where the accident had occurred.
 Other issues on the agenda in Bali include safeguarding the world’s last forests and sharing technology to help developing countries grow in a less polluting way.
 The UN also hopes to finalize a fund to help countries affected by climate change to cope with the impacts.
 The money could be used to build flood-resistant houses, to better manage water and to diversify crops.
 Fluke wrote that efforts by some to prevent women from talking about their health failed.
 She came to this conclusion thanks to the multiple positive comments and encouragement she received from both women and men on the importance of considering contraception as a necessity.
 Once the fight was stopped after the injured were taken to the infirmary, about 40 of the remaining inmates stayed in the yard, refusing to return to their cells.
 Negotiators have tried to rectify the situation, but the prisoners' demands are unclear.
 Between 22:00 and 23:00 MDT, the inmates set a fire in the courtyard.
 Soon, officers equipped with riot gear entered the courtyard and trapped the detainees with tear gas.
 The firefighters finally extinguished the fire at 11:35 p.m.
 After the construction of the dam in 1963, seasonal floods that would have spread sediment into the river were stopped.
 This sediment was necessary for the creation of sandbanks and beaches, which served as habitats for fauna.
 As a result, two fish species have become extinct and two others are in danger of becoming extinct, including the humpbacked mahseer.
 Although the water level will only rise a few metres after the flood, the authorities hope that this will be enough to restore the eroded sandbanks downstream.
 No tsunami alert was issued and, according to the Jakarta geophysics agency, no tsunami alert will be issued because the earthquake did not reach the required magnitude of 6.5.
 Despite the lack of a tsunami risk, residents panicked and fled their homes and businesses.
 Despite the tears shed during her farewell, Oprah Winfrey clearly told her fans that she would be back.
 "It's not a goodbye. It's a page that turns, and another that opens."
 The final results of the Namibian presidential and parliamentary elections indicate that incumbent President Hifikepunye Pohamba has been re-elected by a large majority.
 The ruling party, the South West Africa People's Organization (SWAPO), also managed to retain its majority in the legislative elections.
 Coalition and Afghan troops moved into the area to secure the site and a coalition aircraft was dispatched to assist.
 The accident occurred in mountainous terrain, and it seems that it was caused by a malicious fire.
 Efforts to find the site of the accident are hampered by bad weather and rough terrain.
 According to the NGO Mangola, Doctors Without Borders and the World Health Organization, this is the worst epidemic recorded in the country.
 The spokesman for Médecins Sans Frontières, Richard Veerman, said: "Angola is heading for the worst epidemic ever known and the situation remains very bad in Angola."
 The matches started at 10am in beautiful weather and, apart from the drizzle in the middle of the morning that quickly dissipated, it was a perfect day for 7s rugby.
 South Africa, top of the rankings, started well by beating Zambia 26-0, the fifth-ranked team.
 South Africa, which seemed decidedly rusty in its match against its southern counterparts, however, gradually improved as the tournament progressed.
 Their well-disciplined defense, their ball control and their formidable teamwork allowed them to stand out and it is obvious that they were the team to beat.
 Officials from the city of Amsterdam and the Anne Frank Museum say the tree is infected with a fungus and poses a public health risk, as they argue there is an immediate danger of falling.
 He was due to be executed on Tuesday, but was saved by an emergency court ruling.
 All the entrances to the caves, which have been baptized “The Seven Sisters”, have a diameter of at least 100 to 250 meters.
 Infrared images reveal, by the variations of temperature during the day and the night, that it is probably caves.
 “They are fresher than the surrounding surface during the day and warmer at night.”
 “Their thermal behavior is not as stable as the large caves of the planet that maintain a constant temperature, but they are similar in that they are deep holes in the ground,” according to Glen Cushing, a member of the USGS (United States Geological Survey) crew and staff of the University of Arizona North in Flagstaff, Arizona.
 In France, voting is traditionally a low-tech experience: voters seclude themselves in a booth, put in an envelope a pre-printed paper sheet indicating the candidate of their choice.
 After the agents have verified his identity, the voter drops the envelope into the ballot box and signs his voter card.
 The French electoral code regulates the operations quite strictly.
 Since 1988, the ballot boxes must be transparent so that voters and observers can see that no envelopes are present at the beginning of the vote and that no envelopes are added, except those of the duly counted and authorized voters.
 Candidates can send representatives to attend each step of the process, and the evening votes are counted by volunteers under high surveillance, according to specific procedures.
 The ASUS Eee PC, previously launched globally for reasons of economy and functionality, became a hot topic during the 2007 Taipei IT Month.
 But the laptop market will be profoundly shaken and diversified after ASUS was awarded the Taiwan Sustainable Award 2007 by the Executive Yuan of the Republic of China.
 The station’s website describes the show as a “radio theatre of the old school with a new and scandalous geek twist!”
 Initially, the show was only broadcast on the venerable Internet radio site TogiNet Radio, a site dedicated to spoken word radio.
 In 2015, TogiNet created AstroNet Radio as a subsidiary station.
 Originally, the show featured amateur voice actors from East Texas.
 The widespread looting continued throughout the night, with law enforcement not present in the streets of Bishkek.
 One observer described Bishkek as being in a state of “anarchy”, as the population moved in gangs through the streets and looted shops of consumer goods.
 Several Bishkek residents blamed the protesters from the south for the anarchy.
 South Africa beat the All Blacks (New Zealand) in a rugby match of the Tri-nations at the Royal Bafokeng Stadium in Rustenburg, South Africa.
 The match was decided by a single point, 21-20, ending the All Blacks' 15-game winning streak.
 For the Springboks, it was the end of a five-game losing streak.
 It was the last match of the All Blacks, who had already won the trophy two weeks ago.
 The final match of the championship will take place at Johannesburg’s Ellis Park next week, when the Springboks will face Australia.
 A moderate earthquake shook western Montana Monday at 10:08 p.m.
 The USGS (United States Geological Survey) and its National Earthquake Information Center have not received immediate reports of damage.
 The epicenter of the quake was about 20 km (15 miles) north-northeast of Dillon, and about 65 km (40 miles) south of Butte.
 The strain of deadly bird flu, H5N1, has been confirmed as having infected a dead wild duck found Monday in a marsh near Lyon in eastern France.
 France is the seventh EU country to be affected by the virus, following Austria, Germany, Slovenia, Bulgaria, Greece and Italy.
 Suspected cases of H5N1 in Croatia and Denmark have not yet been confirmed.
 Chambers had sued God for “widespread killing, destruction and terror inflicted on millions and millions of inhabitants of the Earth.”
 Chambers, an angel, says that his trial is "frivolous" and that "anyone can sue anyone."
 The story told in the French opera, by Camille Saint-Saens, is that of an artist "whose life is dictated by his love for drugs and for Japan."
 As a result, the artists smoke cannabis joints on stage, and the theatre itself encourages the audience to join them.
 Newt Gingrich, the former Speaker of the House, Rick Perry, the governor of Texas, and Senator Michele Bachmann finished in fourth, fifth, and sixth place, respectively.
 After the results were published, Newt Gingrich congratulated Rick Santorum, but had harsh words for Mitt Romney, on whose behalf negative advertising campaigns had been broadcast in Iowa against Newt Gingrich.
 Perry said he would "return to Texas to evaluate the results of tonight's caucus, and determine if there is a path forward for me in this race," but he later said he would stay in the race and participate in the January 21 primary in South Carolina.
 Bachmann, who had won the “straw poll” of Souls in August, decided to end her campaign.
 The photographer was transported to the Ronald Reagan UCLA Medical Center, where he died as a result of his injuries.
 According to some sources, he is about 20 years old. In a statement, Bieber said: "While I was not present nor directly involved in this tragic accident, my thoughts and prayers are with the victim's family."
 The TMZ news site says the photographer stopped his vehicle on the other side of Sepulveda Boulevard and attempted to take photos of the police stop before crossing the road and continuing, prompting the California Highway Patrol officer to order him to get back in the car, twice.
 According to the police, it is unlikely that the driver of the vehicle that hit the photographer will face criminal charges.
 With only eighteen medals available per day, a number of countries failed to make it onto the podium of medallists.
 They include the Netherlands, with Anna Jochemsen who finished ninth in the women's Super-G yesterday, and Finland, with Katja Saarinen who finished tenth in the same event.
 Australian Mitchell Gourley was 11th in the men's standing Super-G, Czech Republic's Oldrich Jelinek was 16th in the men's sitting Super-G.
 Mexican Arly Velasquez finished 15th in the men's Super-G sitting. New Zealander Adam Hall finished 9th in the men's Super-G standing.
 The blind Polish skier Maciej Krezel and his guide Anna Ogarzynska finished in thirteenth place in the Super-G. South Korean Jong Seork Park finished in twenty-fourth place in the men's Super-G seated.
 UN peacekeepers, who arrived in Haiti after the 2010 earthquake, are accused of spreading the disease that started near the troops' camp.
 According to the trial, the UN camp's waste was not properly disposed of, causing bacteria to enter the tributary of the Artibonite River, one of Haiti's largest rivers.
 Before the troops arrived, Haiti had not encountered any problems related to the disease since the 1800s.
 The Haitian Institute for Justice and Democracy has referred to independent studies that suggest the UN Nepalese peacekeeping battalion involuntarily brought the disease to Haiti.
 Danielle Lantagne, a UN expert on the disease, said the epidemic was likely caused by the peacekeepers.
 Hamilton confirmed that Howard University Hospital admitted the patient in stable condition.
 The patient had travelled to Nigeria, where some cases of Ebola have occurred.
 The hospital followed protocol for infection prevention, including isolating the patient to avoid possible infection of other patients.
 Before The Simpsons, Simon had worked on several series, occupying various positions.
 During the 1980s, he worked on such shows as Taxi, Cheers and The Tracy Ullman Show.
 In 1989, he participated in the creation of The Simpsons with Brooks and Groening and was responsible for the hiring of the first team of writers of the series.
 Despite his departure from the show in 1993, he retained the title of executive producer and continued to receive tens of millions of dollars each season in royalties.
 The Chinese news agency Xinhua had previously announced the news of the hijacking of an airplane.
 Later reports revealed that the aircraft had been threatened with a bomb attack and was redirected to Afghanistan to land in Kandahar.
 Early reports indicate that the plane was diverted to Afghanistan after being denied an emergency landing in Ürümqi.
 Air crashes are frequent in Iran, which has an ageing and poorly maintained fleet for both civilian and military flights.
 Due to international sanctions, it is not possible to buy new aircraft.
 Earlier this week, a police helicopter crash killed three people and injured three others.
 Last month, Iran experienced its worst air disaster in years when a plane bound for Armenia crashed, killing all 168 people on board.
 That same month, another airliner made a runway excursion in Mashhad and hit a wall, killing seventeen people.
 The Aerosmith group has canceled the last concerts of its tour.
 The rock band was supposed to tour the United States and Canada until September 16.
 They canceled the tour after singer Steven Tyler injured himself falling off stage during a concert on August 5.
 Murray lost the first set in a tie-break after both men held their serve throughout the set.
 Despite the net advantage of Del Potro during the second set, it was necessary to go through a tie-break once the score reached 6-6.
 Potro received treatment for his shoulder at that time, but managed to resume the match.
 The program started at 20:30 local time (15:00 UTC).
 Famous singers from all over the country have presented bhajans, or devotional songs, at the feet of Shri Shyam.
 Singer Sanju Sharma started the evening, followed by Jai Shankar Choudhary. Lakkha Singh also presented the bhajan of Chhappan Bhog, accompanied by Raju Khandelwal.
 Then Lakkha Singh took the initiative to sing the bhajans.
 108 plates of Chhappan Bhog (in Hinduism, 56 different edible foods, such as sweets, fruits, nuts, dishes etc. that are offered to the deity) were served to Baba Shyam.
 Lakkha Singh also presented the chhappan bhog bhajan, while being accompanied by the singer Raju Khandelwal.
 Thursday, during the main presentation of the Tokyo Game Show, Nintendo president Satoru Iwata unveiled the design of the controller of the company's new Nintendo Revolution console.
 Identical to a television remote control, the control uses two sensors placed near the user's television to triangulate its position in three-dimensional space.
 This will allow players to control actions and movements in video games by moving the device in the air.
 Giancarlo Fisichella lost control of his car and finished the race shortly after the start.
 His teammate Fernando Alonso dominated the race, but his pit stop ended that dominance, possibly due to a loose right front wheel.
 Michael Schumacher finished his race shortly after Alonso, due to the damage suffered in the suspensions throughout the race.
 "She's very pretty, and she sings very well too," he said according to a transcript of the news conference.
 “I was moved every time we rehearsed this subject, from the bottom of my heart.”
 About three minutes after launch, an onboard camera showed numerous pieces of insulating foam breaking away from the fuel tank.
 However, it is not thought that they caused any damage to the shuttle.
 The head of NASA's shuttle program, N. Wayne Hale Jr., said the foam fell "after the time that concerns us."
 Five minutes after the beginning of the exhibition, a wind starts to blow to reach, about one minute later, the speed of 70km/h... then the rain arrives, but so strong and so big that it hits your skin like a needle, then the hail falls from the sky, people panic, scream and roll on the ground.
 I lost my sister and her friend, and on my way there were two people in wheelchairs, people who were just jumping and pushing them,” said Armand Versace.
 NHK also said the Kashiwazaki Kariwa nuclear power plant in Niigata Prefecture was operating normally.
 Hokuriku Electric Power Co. reported no effects from the quake and said that reactors No. 1 and 2 at its Shika nuclear power plant have been shut down.
 It is reported that about 9,400 homes in the region are without water, and about 100 are without electricity.
 Some roads have been damaged, the railway service has been suspended in the affected areas, and the Noto Airport in Ishikawa Prefecture is still closed.
 A bomb exploded in front of the governor's office.
 Three other bombs exploded near government buildings in the space of two hours.
 Some reports put the official death toll at eight, and official reports confirm that up to 30 people were injured; but the final figures are not yet known.
 Cyanuric acid and melamine were found in urine samples taken from the pets that died after eating contaminated pet food.
 The two compounds react with each other to form crystals that can block kidney function, researchers at the university said.
 Investigators discovered that crystals had formed in the urine of cats due to the presence of these additional substances, melamine and cyanuric acid.
 The composition of these crystals corresponds to what is found in the urine of affected pets when compared by infrared spectroscopy (IRTF).
 I don't know if you realize it, but most of the goods from Central America enter our country exempt from taxes.
 Yet 80% of our goods were taxed by customs duties in Central American countries. We treat you.
 It didn't seem logical to me; it certainly wasn't fair.
 All I say to people is that you treat us the way we treat you.
 California Governor Arnold Schwarzenegger signed a law that prohibits the sale or rental of violent video games to minors.
 The bill requires violent video games sold in the state of California to be labeled with a sticker bearing the words "18" and makes it a misdemeanor to sell a game to a minor.
 Director of Public Prosecutions, Kier Starmer QC, made a statement this morning announcing the prosecution of Huhne and Pryce.
 Huhne resigned and will be replaced in the cabinet by MP Ed Davey, with MP Norman Lamb expected to take over as Minister of State for Care and Support.
 Huhne and Pryce are due to appear at Westminster Magistrates Court on February 16.
 The victims are Nicholas Alden, 25, and Zachary Cuddeback, 21. Cuddeback was the driver.
 Edgar Veguilla was injured in the arm and jaw while Kristoffer Schneider had to undergo reconstructive surgery for his face.
 Uka's gun jammed as it was pointed at a fifth man's head. Schneider suffers from a throbbing pain, can no longer see out of one eye, has lost part of his skull, and his face has been rebuilt with titanium.
 Schneider testified via video link from an Air Force base in his home country.
 Apart from Wednesday's event, Carpanedo participated in two individual races during the Championships.
 She first competed in slalom, where she finished with a "did not finish" (DNF) in her first race. 36 of the 116 competitors finished with the same result in that race.
 Her other race, the giant slalom, allowed her to finish in tenth place in the women's sitting group with a combined time of 4:41.30, which is 2:11.60 minutes less than the Austrian Claudia Loesch, who finished first, and 1:09.02 minutes less than the Hungarian Gyöngyi Dani, who finished ninth.
 In the category of women in seated skiing, four skiers did not finish their course; in the giant slalom, 45 skiers out of a total of 117 in this race did not manage to classify.
 The Madhya Pradesh police recovered the laptop and mobile phone stolen from the victim.
 Deputy Inspector General D.K. Arya said: "We have arrested five people for raping the Swiss woman, and we have recovered her mobile phone and laptop."
 The accused are Baba Kanjar, Bhutha Kanjar, Rampro Kanjar, Gaza Kanjar and Vishnu Kanjar.
 Chandra Shekhar Solanki, police commissioner, said the accused had their faces covered when they appeared in court.
 Although three people were in the house when the car hit it, no one was injured.
 However, the driver was seriously injured in the head.
 The road where the accident took place was temporarily closed to allow rescue services to remove the driver of the red Audi TT.
 He was first admitted to James Paget Hospital in Great Yarmouth.
 He was then transferred to Cambridge's Addenbrooke's Hospital.
 Adekoya has since been charged with the murder of her son by the Sheriff Court of Edinburgh.
 She is in custody awaiting her trial and her hearing, but the eyewitness testimony could be compromised because her picture has been widely circulated.
 It is a common practice elsewhere in the UK, but Scottish justice operates differently and the courts have considered that publishing photos could be potentially prejudicial.
 Professor Pamela Ferguson, of the University of Dundee, notes that “journalists seem to be following a dangerous line if they publish photos etc of suspects.”
 The Crown Prosecutor's Office, which is in charge of all prosecutions, told reporters that no further comment would be made until the indictment.
 According to the leak, the document will deal with the border dispute that Palestine claims on the basis of the existing borders before the 1967 Middle East war.
 Other topics discussed include the future of Jerusalem, which is sacred to both nations, and the issue of the Jordan Valley.
 Israel demands a permanent military presence in the valley for a period of ten years from the signing of an agreement, while the Palestinian Authority is willing to accept only a five-year period.
 The additional parasite control shooters were to be closely monitored by rangers, as the trial was controlled and its effectiveness evaluated.
 As part of a partnership between NPWS and the Sporting Shooters Association of Australia (NSW) Inc., qualified volunteers were recruited as part of the Sporting Shooters Association’s hunting program.
 According to Mick O'Flynn, acting head of conservation of the park and heritage at the NPWS, the four shooters designated for the first cull were duly trained and trained in safety guidelines.
 Martelly inaugurated yesterday a new Provisional Electoral Council (CEP) composed of nine members.
 This is the fifth PEC of Martelly in four years.
 Last month, a presidential commission recommended the dissolution of the previous CEP as part of a package of measures to set the country on the path to new elections.
 This commission was Martelly's response to the widespread protests against the regime that began in October.
 These sometimes violent protests were triggered by the absence of elections, some of which were due to take place in 2011.
 About 60 cases of overheating defective iPods have been reported, causing a total of six fires and leaving four people with minor burns.
 The Japanese Ministry of Economy, Trade and Industry (METI) said it had been informed of 27 accidents involving the devices.
 Last week, the METI announced that Apple had informed it of 34 additional overheating incidents, which the company described as “non-serious.”
 The ministry reacted by calling the Apple report "really regrettable."
 The earthquake struck the Mariana Islands at 7:19 a.m. local time (21:19 GMT Friday).
 The Northern Mariana Islands Emergency Management Office said no damage had been reported in that country.
 In addition, the Pacific Tsunami Warning Center said there was no sign of a tsunami.
 An ex-policeman from the Philippines took hostage tourists from Hong Kong by hijacking their bus in Manila, the capital of the Philippines.
 Rolando Mendoza fired his M16 rifle at the tourists.
 Several hostages have been rescued, and the death of at least six of them has been confirmed so far.
 Six hostages, including children and elderly people, were released prematurely, as were the Filipino photographers.
 The photographers then took the place of an elderly lady who needed to go to the bathroom. Mendoza was shot.
 Liggins followed in his father's footsteps and embarked on a career as a doctor.
 He trained as an obstetrician, and began working at the National Women's Hospital in Auckland in 1959.
 While working at the hospital, Liggins began to investigate premature births in his spare time.
 His research showed that if a hormone was administered, it would accelerate the pulmonary maturation of the baby.
 The Xinhua news agency reported that government investigators recovered two flight recorders (or "black boxes") on Wednesday.
 Other wrestlers also paid tribute to Luna.
 Tommy Dreamer said: "Luna was the first queen of extreme. My first manager. Luna passed away on the night of two moons. A unique moment, just like her. A strong woman."
 Dustin "Goldust" Runnels commented that "Luna was as weird as me... maybe even weirder... I love her and I'm going to miss her... I hope she's in a better place."
 A poll of 1,400 people before the 2010 federal election found that opposition to Australia becoming a republic had increased by 8% since 2008.
 Acting Prime Minister Julia Gillard said during the 2010 federal election campaign that she thought Australia should become a republic at the end of Queen Elizabeth II's reign.
 34% of those surveyed share this view, and wish that Queen Elizabeth II was the last monarch to reign over Australia.
 At the extremes of the poll, 29% of those surveyed think Australia should become a republic as soon as possible, while 31% think Australia should never become a republic.
 The Olympic gold medallist was due to swim the 100m and 200m freestyle and three relays at the Commonwealth Games, but because of his complaints his fitness has been called into question.
 He was unable to take the necessary medication to overcome his pain, as it was forbidden during the Games.
 Curtis Cooper, a mathematician and computer science professor at the University of Central Missouri, discovered on January 25 the largest prime number known to date.
 Several people verified the discovery using different equipment and software in early February, and it was announced Tuesday.
 Comets may have been a source of water for the Earth, as well as organic matter that can form proteins and promote life.
 Scientists hope to understand how planets form, and in particular how the Earth formed, since comets collided with it long ago.
 Cuomo, 53, took office in January and signed a bill last month legalizing same-sex marriage.
 He called the rumors "gossip and political nonsense."
 He is expected to run for president in 2016.
 According to the FAA, NextGen is a system that would allow planes to fly shorter distances and save millions of gallons of fuel each year, limiting carbon emissions.
 It relies on satellite technology, rather than the ground-based radar systems used previously, which allows air traffic controllers to locate planes with greater precision and provide pilots with more detailed information.
 Additional transportation is non-existent and surface trains will not stop at Wembley, and parking and park and rides are not available on the ground.
 Fear of transportation shortages has created the possibility that the match could be played behind closed doors, without the teams' fans.
 A study published Thursday in the journal Science reported the genesis of a new species of bird in the Galapagos Islands of Ecuador.
 Researchers from Princeton University in the United States and Uppsala University in Sweden have indicated that the new species evolved in just two generations, although this process was estimated to be much longer, following reproduction between an endemic Darwin's finch, Geospiza fortis, and the immigrant conical bills finch, Geospiza conirostris.
 Gold can be shaped in many ways. It can be rolled into tiny pieces.
 It can be drawn into fine wire, which can be twisted and braided. It can be hammered or rolled into sheets.
 It can be made very thin, and glued to another metal. It can be so thin that it has sometimes been used to decorate hand-painted images in books called "illuminated manuscripts".
 This is called the pH of a chemical. You can make a pH indicator using red cabbage juice.
 The juice of cabbage changes color depending on the acidity or basicity (alkalinity) of the chemical.
 The pH level is indicated by the amount of hydrogen ions (the H in pH) present in the chemical being tested.
 Hydrogen ions are protons that have been stripped of their electron (since hydrogen atoms are made up of a proton and an electron).
 Mix the two dry powders together, then, with clean, wet hands, press them into a ball.
 The moisture on your hands will react with the outer layers, which will induce a strange sensation and produce a kind of shell.
 The cities of Harappa and Mohenjo-daro had toilets equipped with a flushing water in almost every house, connected to a sophisticated sewage system.
 Remains of sewer systems have been found in the houses of Minoan towns in Crete and Santorini in Greece.
 There were also toilets in ancient Egypt, Persia and China. In the Roman civilization, toilets were sometimes part of public baths where men and women mingled.
 When you call someone who is thousands of miles away, you use a satellite.
 The satellite receives the call in space and then sends it back to Earth, almost instantly.
 The satellite was sent into space by a rocket. Scientists use telescopes in space because the earth's atmosphere distorts some of our light and vision.
 It takes a giant rocket more than 30 metres high to put a satellite or a telescope into space.
 The wheel changed the world in many ways. The greatest advantage it brought us is that it made transport much simpler and faster.
 This has brought us the train, the car and many other means of transport.
 Below are smaller cats that eat prey of a similar size, ranging from rabbits to antelopes and other deer.
 In addition, there are many small cats (including pet cats that are free) that eat the many small prey, such as insects, rodents, lizards and birds.
 The secret of their success is the concept of niche, a special task assigned to each feline, preventing it from entering into competition with others.
 Lions are the most sociable cats, living in large groups called prides.
 The packs are composed of one to three adult males related, as well as about thirty females and cubs.
 Women are usually very close to each other, as their family is made up of a large number of sisters and daughters.
 Lion prides act like wolf or dog packs, animals that are surprisingly similar to lions (but not other big cats) in their behavior, and also very deadly to their prey.
 A balanced athlete, the tiger can climb (but sometimes with difficulty), swim, jump long distances and pull with five times the force of a powerful human.
 The tiger belongs to the same family (genus Panthera) as lions, leopards and jaguars, and these four felines are the only ones capable of roaring.
 The roar of the tiger does not resemble the ample roar of the lion, but rather to a sentence whose words would be cries and growls.
 Ocelots are fond of small animals. They catch monkeys, snakes, rodents and birds if they can. Almost all the animals that the ocelot hunts are much smaller than it is.
 According to scientists, ocelots track and find their prey (prey) by smell, sniffing their path on the ground.
 They see very well in the dark thanks to their nocturnal vision, and also move very stealthily. Ocelots stalk their prey by blending into their surroundings before pouncing on them.
 When a small group of living things (a small population) is separated from the main population from which it came (for example, if it moves over a mountain range or a river, or moves to a new island so that it cannot easily return), it often ends up in a different environment than the one it was in before.
 This new environment has different resources and competitors, so the new population will need new characteristics or adaptations to be a strong competitor compared to what it needed before.
 The original population has not changed at all, it still needs the same adaptations.
 Over time, as the new population adapts to its new environment, it begins to look less and less like the other population.
 Finally, after thousands or even millions of years, the two populations will look so different that they can no longer be considered to belong to the same species.
 We call this process “speciation,” which simply means the formation of new species. Speciation is an inevitable consequence and a very important part of evolution.
 Plants produce the oxygen that humans breathe, and they absorb the carbon dioxide that humans exhale (that is, breathe out).
 Plants produce their food using the sun through photosynthesis. They also provide shade.
 We make our homes and clothes from plants. Most of the food we eat comes from plants. Without plants, animals would not survive.
 The mosasaur was the super predator of the time, it feared nothing, except other mosasaurs.
 Its long jaws were lined with more than 70 razor-sharp teeth, as well as an extra set of teeth in the palate, so that anything that crossed its path could not escape.
 We're not sure, but it may have had a forked tongue. His diet included turtles, large fish, other mosasaurs, and he may even have been a cannibal.
 He also attacked anything that entered the water; even a giant dinosaur such as a T. rex was no match for him.
 Although the Romans ate food that we know, they ate some strange or unusual dishes, including wild boar, peacocks, snails and the shrew, a type of rodent.
 Another difference: while the poor and the woman ate their food while sitting on chairs, the rich men liked to organize banquets together where they rested on the side while they ate.
 The Roman meals of antiquity could not include these foods of American or Asian origin that were introduced to Europe centuries later.
 For example, they had no corn, tomatoes, potatoes, cocoa, and no ancient Roman ever tasted turkey.
 The Babylonians built for each of their gods a main temple which was considered the god's home.
 People made sacrifices to the gods and priests tried to meet the needs of the gods through ceremonies and festivals.
 Each temple had an open courtyard, then an inner sanctuary which only the priests could access.
 Some pyramidal towers, the ziggurats, were sometimes built as elements of a temple.
 The top of the tower was a special sanctuary for the god.
 In the hot climate of the Middle East, the house was not so important.
 Most of the life of the Hebrew family took place outdoors.
 Women cooked in the courtyard; shops were only open counters on the street; houses were built of stone.
 As there were no large forests in the land of Canaan, wood was extremely expensive.
 Greenland was sparsely populated. In the Scandinavian sagas, it is said that Erik the Red was exiled from Iceland for murder and that he found Greenland — and named it so — while travelling further west.
 But independently of its discovery, Eskimo tribes already lived there at the time.
 Although each country is "Scandinavian", there are many differences between the peoples, the kings, the customs and the history of Denmark, Sweden, Norway, and Iceland.
 If you saw the movie National Treasure, you might think that a treasure map was drawn on the back of the Declaration of Independence.
 However, this is not true. Although there is an inscription on the back of the document, it is not a treasure map.
 On the back of the Declaration of Independence, you can read the words "Original Declaration of Independence dated July 4, 1776." The text is at the bottom of the document, upside down.
 Although no one really knows who wrote it, it is known that at an early stage of its existence, the Great Scroll (which measures about 29 inches three quarters by 24 inches) was stored rolled.
 It is therefore likely that the rating was added simply as a label.
 The D-Day landings and the subsequent battles freed northern France, but the south was still not free.
 It was governed by the French of Vichy, French who made peace with the Germans in 1940 and collaborated with the occupier instead of confronting them.
 On August 15, 1940, the Allies landed in the south of France, an invasion called Operation "Dragoon".
 In just two weeks, the Americans and the French Forces of the Free had liberated the south of France and were heading for Germany.
 A civilization is a unique culture shared by a large group of people who live and work together in cooperation, a society.
 The term "civilization" is derived from the Latin word "civilis", which means civil and which is related to the Latin words "civis", which means citizen, and "civitas", which means large city or city-state and which also indicates, in some way, the size of the society to which it refers.
 City-States are the precursors of nations. A civilizational culture implies the transmission of knowledge over several generations, a lasting cultural imprint and a fair diffusion.
 Minority cultures often disappear without leaving any relevant historical traces and are not recognized as true civilizations.
 During the Revolutionary War, the thirteen states first formed a weak central government — the Congress being its only component — under the Articles of Confederation.
 Congress had no power to impose taxes, and since there was no national executive or judicial authority, it relied on state authorities, often uncooperative, to enforce its acts.
 Nor did he have the power to waive tax laws or tariff laws between the states.
 The articles required the unanimous consent of all the states before they could be amended, and the states took the central government so lightly that their representatives were often absent.
 The Italian national football team is, along with the German national team, the second most successful national team in the world and won the FIFA World Cup in 2006.
 Popular sports include football, basketball, volleyball, fencing, rugby, cycling, ice hockey, roller hockey and Formula 1.
 Winter sports are the most popular in the northern regions, with Italians participating in international games and Olympic events.
 Japan has nearly 7,000 islands (the largest being Honshu), making it the 7th largest island in the world!
 Due to the group of islands that make up the country, Japan is often referred to, from a geographical point of view, as an "archipelago".
 The first information about Taiwan dates back to the 15th century, while European navigators passing by mentioned it under the name of Ilha Formosa, or “beautiful island”.
 In 1624, the Dutch East India Company established a base in southwestern Taiwan, introducing a transformation of indigenous cereal production practices and employing Chinese workers to work in its rice and sugar plantations.
 In 1683, the forces of the Qing dynasty (1644-1912) took control of the western and northern coastal areas of Taiwan and declared it a province of the Qing Empire in 1885.
 In 1895, after its defeat in the First Sino-Japanese War (1894–1895), the Qing government signed the Treaty of Shimonoseki, by which it ceded sovereignty of Taiwan to Japan, which ruled the island until 1945.
 Machu Picchu is composed of three main structures, namely the Intihuatana, the Temple of the Sun and the Room of the Three Windows.
 Most of the buildings bordering the complex have been rebuilt to give tourists a better view of their original appearance.
 In 1976, thirty percent of Machu Picchu had been restored and this restoration continues to this day.
 For example, the most common photographic format in the world is 35 mm; it was the most common film format at the end of the analogue era.
 It is still manufactured today, but what matters is that its image format is inherited from the format of the digital camera sensor.
 The 35mm format is actually, and this is quite confusing, 36mm wide by 24mm high.
 So the aspect ratio of this format (by dividing by twelve to get the simplest of integer ratios) is 3:2.
 Many common formats (the APS family, for example) are equal to this aspect ratio or close to it.
 The third party rule, badly abused and often ridiculed, is a simple directive that stimulates dynamism while offering protection to the image.
 It indicates that the most effective place for the main subject is at the intersection of the lines dividing the image into thirds vertically and horizontally (see example).
 During this period of European history, the Catholic Church, which had become rich and powerful, was questioned.
 For more than a thousand years, the Christian religion has bound the European states together despite differences in language and customs.
 His omnipresent power touched everyone, from the king to the commoner.
 One of the main Christian principles is that wealth should be used to alleviate suffering and poverty and that church funds are there specifically for that reason.
 The central authority of the church has been in Rome for over 1000 years and this concentration of power and money has led many people to question whether this doctrine is being followed.
 Shortly after the beginning of hostilities, Great Britain established a naval blockade against Germany.
 This strategy proved effective, cutting off vital military and civilian supplies, though the blockade violated generally accepted international law codified by several international agreements over the last two centuries.
 Britain mined international waters to prevent ships from venturing into entire maritime zones, thus posing a threat even to neutral ships.
 As this tactic only provoked a timid response, Germany expected a similar reaction to its unrestricted submarine warfare.
 During the 1920s, most citizens and nations showed a penchant for pacifism and isolation.
 After seeing the horrors and atrocities of war during the First World War, nations wanted to avoid such a situation in the future.
 In 1884, Tesla moved to the United States of America to accept a job at the Edison Company in New York.
 He arrived in the United States with four hundred dollars in his name, a book of poetry and a letter of recommendation from Charles Batchelor (his director in his previous job) to Thomas Edison.
 Ancient China had a unique way of showing the different eras; each stage of China or each family that was in power was a distinct dynasty.
 Between each dynasty, there was also an unstable age of divided provinces. The best known of these periods is the Three Kingdoms era, which lasted 60 years between the Han dynasty and the Jin dynasty.
 During these periods, fierce struggles took place between many members of the nobility who fought for the throne.
 The Three Kingdoms was one of the bloodiest periods in the history of Chinese Antiquity. Thousands of people died in battle to sit on the throne of the great palace in Xi'an.
 There are many social and political implications such as the use of the metric system, the transition from absolutism to republicanism, nationalism and the belief that the country belongs to the people and not to a single leader.
 Also, after the Revolution, the trades were opened to all male candidates, allowing the most ambitious and talented to succeed.
 The same goes for the army, as the ranking of the armies is no longer based on class, but on caliber.
 The French Revolution also inspired many other oppressed working classes in other countries to begin their own revolutions.
 Muhammad was deeply interested in questions that went beyond the confines of this worldly life. He used to frequent a cave that became famous as “Hira’” on the mountain of “Noor” (light) for contemplation.
 The cave itself, which has survived to the present day, gives a vivid picture of Muhammad's spiritual inclinations.
 Situated at the top of one of the mountains north of Mecca, the cave is totally isolated from the rest of the world.
 In reality, it is not easy at all to find, even if we know that it exists. When we entered the cave, we were completely isolated.
 Above, one can only contemplate the clear and magnificent sky and the numerous surrounding mountains. From the inside of the cave, one can only see or hear very little of this universe.
 The Great Pyramid of Giza is the only one of the seven wonders that still exists today.
 Built by the Egyptians during the third millennium B.C., the Great Pyramid is one of the many giant structures erected in honor of the deceased pharaohs.
 The Giza Plateau, or “Giza Necropolis,” in the Valley of the Kings in Egypt, is home to several pyramids (the Great Pyramid being the largest), several smaller tombs, numerous temples, and the Great Sphinx.
 The Great Pyramid was built to honor Pharaoh Khufu, and many smaller pyramids, tombs, and temples were built to honor his wives and family members.
 The "push" symbol looks like a V and the "pull" symbol looks like a staple or a square with the bottom side missing.
 The top means you should start at the tip and push the bow, and the bottom means you should start at the frog (which is where your hand holds the bow) and pull the bow.
 An upward bow produces a softer sound, while a downward bow is louder and more assertive.
 Feel free to write your own marks in pencil, but remember that the printed bow marks are for a musical reason, and that you should generally respect them.
 On October 6, 1789, King Louis XVI, Queen Marie-Antoinette, their two young children (Marie-Thérèse, 11, and Louis-Charles, 4), and the king's sister, Madame Élisabeth, all terrified, are forced to return to Paris from Versailles by a crowd of vendors.
 In a carriage, they returned to Paris surrounded by a crowd of people who shouted and screamed threats against the king and queen.
 The king and queen were forced, because of the crowd, to have the windows of their carriages opened.
 At one point, a member of the crowd brandished the head of a royal guard killed at Versailles in front of the terrified queen.
 The war expenditures of American imperialism in the conquest of the Philippines were paid by the Filipino people themselves.
 They were forced to pay taxes to the American colonial regime to cover a large part of the expenses and interest on bonds issued in the name of the Philippine government by Wall Street banking houses.
 Naturally, the superprofits accruing from the prolonged exploitation of the Filipino people could constitute the fundamental benefits of American imperialism.
 To understand the Templars, one must understand the context that led to the creation of the order.
 These events took place in the period generally considered as the High Middle Ages – the period of history in Europe from the 11th to the 13th century (1000-1300).
 The Central Middle Ages was preceded by the High Middle Ages and followed by the Late Middle Ages, which conventionally ends around 1500.
 Technological determinism is a term that encompasses a broad range of ideas in practice, ranging from technological push or technological imperative to a strict sense in which the fate of humanity is dictated by an underlying logic related to scientific laws and their manifestation in technologies.
 Most interpretations of technological determinism agree on two general ideas: technological development itself proceeds according to a process that largely transcends cultural and political influences, and technology has an impact on intrinsically conditioned societies rather than socially conditioned ones.
 For example, one could say that the automobile necessarily leads to the development of roads.
 However, a national road network is not economically viable for a handful of cars, which is why new production methods are being developed to reduce the cost of owning a car.
 Massive car ownership also leads to a greater impact of accidents on the roads, which leads to the invention of new techniques in the field of health care to treat injuries.
 Romanticism presented an important element of cultural determinism, drawn from writers such as Goethe, Fichte and Schlegel.
 According to the theories of Romanticism, geography would have shaped individuals and, over time, customs and a culture related to this geography would have appeared. These, in harmony with the places occupied by society, would be preferable to laws imposed arbitrarily.
 In the same way that Paris is known as the capital of the contemporary fashion world, Constantinople was considered the capital of feudal Europe.
 Its reputation as the epicenter of luxury began around the year 400, and lasted until about 1100.
 Its status declined during the twelfth century, mainly because the Crusaders returned laden with gifts such as silk and spices, with which the Byzantine markets could not compete.
 It was at this time that the title of fashion capital was transferred from Constantinople to Paris.
 Gothic style reached its apogee between the 10th–11th century and the 14th century.
 At first, the dress was strongly influenced by the Byzantine culture in the east.
 However, due to the slowness of communication, Western modes could be delayed by 25 to 30 years.
 During the late Middle Ages, Western Europe began to develop its own style. One of the greatest advances of the time, following the Crusades, was the use of buttons for clothing fasteners.
 Subsistence agriculture is agriculture practiced to produce enough food to meet only the needs of the farmer and his family.
 Subsistence agriculture is a simple, often organic system using indigenous seed stocks from the ecoregion, combined with crop rotation or other relatively simple techniques to maximize yield.
 Historically, most farmers practiced subsistence agriculture and this is still the case in many developing countries.
 Subcultures bring together individuals who feel neglected by societal norms and share the same ideas, allowing them to develop a sense of identity.
 Subcultures can be distinguished by age, ethnic origin, class, location and/or gender of the members.
 The criteria that determine a subculture as distinct may be linguistic, aesthetic, religious, political, sexual, geographic, or a combination of factors.
 Members of a subculture often signal their membership by distinctive and symbolic use of style, which encompasses fashions, mannerisms, and slang.
 One of the most common methods used to illustrate the importance of socialization is to draw on the few unfortunate cases of children who, through neglect, misfortune or deliberate abuse, have not been socialized by adults during their childhood.
 These children are considered "feral" or wild. Some feral children have been confined by people (usually their own parents); in some cases, the abandonment of the child was due to the parents' rejection of a severe intellectual or physical disability of the child.
 Wild children may have suffered severe abuse or trauma before being abandoned or running away.
 Others would have been raised by animals; some would have lived alone in the wild.
 When they are fully raised by non-human species, feral children display behaviors (within the limits of their physical dispositions) almost identical to those of the animals that raised them, such as fear or indifference towards humans.
 While project-based learning should make learning easier and more interesting, support goes further.
 Support is not a method of learning but rather a means of helping learners who are discovering new learning such as using a new program or starting a new project.
 Supports can be both virtual and real. In other words, a teacher is a form of support, but the little man trombone of Microsoft Office is one too.
 Virtual scaffolding is integrated into the software and is designed to question, guide and explain procedures that might have been too difficult to manage for the student alone.
 Children are placed in foster care for a variety of reasons ranging from neglect to abuse, to extortion.
 No child should ever have to grow up in an environment that is not stimulating, caring and educational, but that is the case.
 We perceive the foster care system as a safe zone for these children.
 Our foster care system is supposed to provide safe homes, loving caregivers, stable education, and reliable health care.
 Placement in foster care is supposed to provide all the necessities that were lacking in the home from which they were removed.
 The Internet combines elements of mass communication and interpersonal communication.
 The distinctive characteristics of the Internet lead to additional dimensions in terms of the approach to uses and gratifications.
 For example, "learning" and "socialization" are considered to be major factors in the use of the Internet (James et al., 1995).
 “Personal involvement” and “ongoing relationships” were also identified as new motivational aspects by Eighmey and McCord (1998) when they studied public reactions to websites.
 The use of video recording has led to great discoveries in the interpretation of micro-expressions, that is, facial expressions lasting a few milliseconds.
 It is claimed that one can detect if a person is lying by correctly interpreting micro-expressions.
 Oliver Sacks, in his article The President’s Speech, indicated how people who cannot understand speech due to brain damage are nevertheless able to accurately assess sincerity.
 He even suggests that such capacities for interpreting human behavior may be found in animals such as domestic dogs.
 Research in the twentieth century showed that there are two reservoirs of genetic variation: hidden and expressed.
 The mutation adds a new genetic variation, and selection removes it from the pool of expressed variations.
 Segregation and recombination alternate variations between the two basins at each generation.
 In the savannah, it is difficult for a primate with a digestive system similar to that of humans to meet its amino acid needs from the available plant resources.
 In addition, a lack of reaction has serious consequences: growth disorders, malnutrition and ultimately death.
 The most readily available plant resources would be the proteins contained in leaves and legumes, but these are difficult to digest for primates like us, unless cooked.
 In contrast, animal-based food (ants, termites, eggs) is easy to digest while providing a large amount of protein containing all the essential amino acids.
 All things considered, we shouldn't be surprised if our own ancestors solved their "protein problem" in much the same way as the savanna chimpanzees do today.
 Sleep interruption is the process of intentionally waking up during your sleep period and falling asleep again shortly afterwards (10 to 60 minutes).
 This can be done easily by using a relatively silent alarm clock, so that you can wake up without fully waking up.
 If you find yourself resetting the clock while you sleep, it can be placed on the other side of the room, forcing you to get out of bed to turn it off.
 Other biorythmic-based possibilities include drinking lots of fluids before bed (especially water or tea, reputed to be diuretic), which forces you to wake up to urinate.
 The degree of inner peace of a person is opposed to the degree of tension in his body and mind.
 The lower the tension, the more the vital force is positive. Every person has the possibility to find absolute peace and contentment.
 Everyone can attain enlightenment. The only thing that stands in the way of this goal is our own tension and negativity.
 Tibetan Buddhism is based on the teachings of the Buddha, but has been enriched by the Mahayana path of love and by many techniques of Indian yoga.
 In principle, Tibetan Buddhism is very simple: it consists of Kundalini Yoga, meditation and the way of universal love.
 With Kundalini Yoga, the Kundalini energy (energy of enlightenment) is awakened by yoga postures, breathing exercises, mantras and visualizations.
 The center of Tibetan meditation is the yoga of the deity. It is through the visualization of various deities that the energy channels are cleaned, the chakras activated, and the awakened consciousness created.
 Germany was a common enemy during World War II, which led to cooperation between the USSR and the United States. At the end of the war, deep conflicts between their different systems, methods and cultures ended the alliance between these two countries.
 Two years after the end of the war, the former allies became enemies and the Cold War began.
 It was to last for the next 40 years and would see real fighting, through proxy armies, on battlefields in Africa and Asia, in Afghanistan, Cuba and many other places.
 On September 17, 1939, the Polish defense was already broken, and the only hope was to retreat and reorganize along the Romanian bridgehead.
 But these plans became obsolete almost overnight, when more than 800,000 soldiers of the Soviet Red Army arrived and created the Belorussian and Ukrainian fronts after invading the eastern regions of Poland, thus violating the Riga Peace Treaty, the Soviet-Polish non-aggression pact, and other international treaties, whether bilateral or multilateral.
 The use of ships for the transport of goods is by far the most efficient way to move large quantities of people and goods across the oceans.
 The work of navies has traditionally been to ensure that your country retains the ability to move your people and your goods, while interfering with your enemy's ability to move his people and his goods.
 One of the most remarkable recent examples of this situation was the North Atlantic campaign during World War II, when the Americans tried to get troops and equipment across the Atlantic to help Britain.
 At the same time, the German Navy, using mainly U-Boats, tried to stop this traffic.
 If the Allies had failed, Germany would probably have been able to conquer Britain as it had conquered the rest of Europe.
 It seems that goats were first domesticated about 10,000 years ago in the Zagros Mountains of Iran.
 Ancient cultures and tribes began keeping them close by for easy access to milk, hair, meat, and hides.
 Domestic goats were usually kept in herds that roamed the hills or other grazing areas, often tended by herdsmen who were mostly children or teenagers, similar to the more well-known term shepherds. These pastoral methods are still in use today.
 The wagonways were built in England as early as the 16th century.
 Although the wagon ways were simply made of parallel wooden planks, they allowed the horses that pulled them to reach greater speeds and to pull larger loads than on the slightly more accident-prone roads of the day.
 The cross-ties were introduced early to keep the tracks in place, but it was soon realized that the tracks would be more effective if they were equipped with a strip of iron on top.
 This became a common practice, but the iron caused more wear on the wooden wheels of the wagons.
 Finally, wooden wheels were replaced by iron wheels. In 1767, the first iron rails made their appearance.
 The very first means of locomotion was walking: humans began to walk upright two million years ago with the arrival of Homo Erectus ("upright man").
 Their predecessors, the australopithecines, did not walk upright as usual.
 Bipedal specializations are found in the fossils of Australopithecus from 4.2 to 3.9 million years ago, although Sahelanthropus may have walked on two legs as early as seven million years ago.
 We can start by living in better harmony with the environment, we can join the environmental movement, and we can even campaign to alleviate future suffering.
 In many cases, this is a symptomatic treatment. However, if we do not want only a temporary solution, we must find the root of the problems and deactivate them.
 It is clear that the world has changed a lot thanks to the scientific and technological advances made by humans, and that problems have become more important due to overpopulation and the extravagant lifestyle of humanity.
 After its adoption by Congress on July 4, a handwritten draft signed by Congress President John Hancock and Secretary Charles Thomson was then sent a few blocks away to John Dunlap's printing shop.
 During the night, between 150 and 200 were made, today known as the "Dunlap Broadsides".
 The first public reading of the document was made by John Nixon in the Independence Hall courtyard on July 8.
 One of these was sent to George Washington on July 6, which he read to his troops in New York on July 9, and a copy reached London on August 10.
 The 25 Dunlap broadsides that are known to exist are the earliest known copies of the document; the original manuscript copy has not survived.
 Many paleontologists now believe that a group of dinosaurs survived and are still alive today. They are called birds.
 Few people consider them to be dinosaurs, given that they have wings and can fly.
 But there are many things about birds that still resemble a dinosaur.
 They have feet covered with scales and claws, they lay eggs and walk on their two hind legs like T-Rex.
 Virtually all computers used today are based on the manipulation of information that is encoded in binary form.
 A binary number can only have one of two values: 0 or 1. These numbers are called binary digits, or bits, in computer jargon.
 Internal poisoning may not be immediately visible. Symptoms such as vomiting are general enough that an immediate diagnosis cannot be made.
 The best indicator of internal poisoning is probably the presence of an open container of toxic medications or household chemicals.
 Consult the label for specific first aid instructions for this poison.
 The term “insect” is used by entomologists in a formal sense for this group of insects.
 This term derives from an ancient familiarity with bedbugs, which are insects very adapted to parasitize humans.
 The bedbugs, like the bedbugs, are nidicolous, that is, adapted to live in the nest or habitat of their host.
 In the United States, there are about 400,000 known cases of multiple sclerosis (MS), making it the leading neurological disease in young and middle-aged adults.
 Multiple sclerosis is a disease that affects the central nervous system, which is made up of the brain, spinal cord and optic nerve.
 Research has shown that women are twice as likely to have multiple sclerosis as men.
 A couple may very well consider that it is not in their interest, nor in the interest of the child, to take care of the education of a baby.
 These couples can choose to make an adoption project for their baby.
 In the context of adoption, biological parents terminate their parental rights so that another couple can raise the child.
 The main objective of science is to understand how the world works through the scientific method, which guides most scientific research.
 However, it is not the only one, experimentation, and an experiment is a test that serves to eliminate one or more of the possible hypotheses, ask questions and make observations, but that also guides scientific research.
 Naturalists and philosophers focused on ancient texts, and in particular on the Latin Bible.
 Aristotle's opinions on all scientific matters, including psychology, were accepted.
 With the decline of knowledge of Greek, the West was cut off from its Greek philosophical and scientific roots.
 Many rhythms observed in physiology and behavior often depend largely on the presence of endogenous cycles and their production by biological clocks.
 Periodic rhythms, which are not simply responses to periodic external stimuli, have been documented for most living organisms, including bacteria, fungi, plants, and animals.
 Biological clocks are self-sustaining oscillators that will continue a cycle of operation for a certain period, even in the absence of external stimulation.
 The Hershey and Chase experiment was one of the main indications that DNA was a genetic material.
 Hershey and Chase used phages, or viruses, to implant their own DNA into a bacterium.
 They conducted two experiments to label either the phage DNA with radioactive phosphorus, or the phage protein with radioactive sulfur.
 Mutations can have many different effects depending on the type of mutation, the size of the part of the genetic material affected, and whether the affected cells are germ cells.
 Only mutations of the germ cells can be passed on to children, while other mutations can cause cells to die or cancer.
 Ecotourism is of interest to people who want to visit natural areas for the purpose of enjoying the scenery, including wildlife and flora.
 Hunting, fishing, photography, bird watching, visiting parks and studying ecosystem information are examples of activities on the ground.
 For example, you can go to see, photograph and discover the orangutans of Borneo.
 Every morning, people leave the small towns in their cars to go to work and cross other people who are going to work in the countryside they have just left.
 In this dynamic transportation shuttle, everyone is in some way connected to a transportation system based on private cars and supports it.
 Science now shows that this carbon-based economy has dislodged the biosphere from its state of stability that has supported human evolution for two million years.
 Everyone is part of society and uses transport systems. Almost everyone complains about transport systems.
 In developed countries, it is rare to hear so many complaints about the quality of water or the collapse of bridges.
 Why do transportation systems generate so many complaints, why do they break down daily? Are transportation engineers simply incompetent, or is something more fundamental going on?
 Traffic flow is the study of the movements of drivers and individual vehicles between two points, and the interactions they exert on each other.
 Unfortunately, it is difficult to study the flow of traffic because the behavior of drivers cannot be predicted with one hundred percent certainty.
 Fortunately, drivers tend to act within a reasonably consistent range; thus, traffic flows tend to have reasonable consistency and can be represented mathematically in an approximate manner.
 To better represent the traffic flow, relationships have been established between the three main characteristics: (1) the flow rate, (2) the density and (3) the speed.
 These relationships help in the planning, design, and operation of road facilities.
 Insects were the first animals to fly. Their ability to fly allowed them to escape their enemies more easily and to find food and mates more efficiently.
 Most insects have the advantage of being able to fold their wings along the body.
 This gives them a greater number of small places to hide from predators.
 Today, the only insects that cannot fold their wings are dragonflies and mayflies.
 A few thousand years ago, a man named Aristarchus claimed that the solar system moved around the Sun.
 Some thought he was right, but many believed the opposite: that the solar system was moving around the Earth, including the Sun (and even the other stars).
 That seems reasonable, because the Earth doesn't seem to move, does it?
 The Amazon River is the second longest and largest river on Earth. It carries more than eight times the volume of water of the second largest river.
 The Amazon is also the widest river in the world, sometimes reaching 10 km wide.
 No less than 20% of the water that flows from the planet's rivers into the oceans comes from the Amazon.
 The main arm of the Amazon River is 6,387 km (3,980 miles) long. It collects water from thousands of small rivers.
 Although the construction of stone pyramids continued until the end of the Old Kingdom, the pyramids of Giza were never surpassed in size or technical excellence of construction.
 Ancient Egyptians of the New Kingdom were amazed by the monuments of their predecessors, which were then more than a thousand years old.
 The Vatican has about 800 inhabitants. It is the smallest independent country in the world, and the least populated.
 The Vatican City State drafts its legislation and official communications in Italian.
 Italian is also the everyday language used by most people who work in the state, while Latin is often used in religious ceremonies.
 The citizens of the Vatican City are all Catholic.
 Since ancient times, people have been familiar with the basic chemical elements such as gold, silver and copper, because they are found in nature in their raw form and are fairly easy to mine using primitive tools.
 Aristotle, a philosopher, theorized that everything is made up of a mixture of one or more of the four elements: earth, water, air, and fire.
 Rather, it was the four states of matter (in the same order) solid, liquid, gaseous and plasma, although he also put forward the theory that the latter transform into new substances to form what we see.
 Alloys are essentially a mixture of two or more metals. Remember that the periodic table contains many elements.
 Elements like calcium and potassium are considered metals. Of course, there are also metals like silver and gold.
 There are also alloys that include a small amount of non-metallic elements, such as carbon.
 Everything in the Universe is made of matter. All matter is made of tiny particles called atoms.
 Atoms are so incredibly small that billions of them could fit into the period at the end of this sentence.
 So, the pencil was a good friend to many people when it came out.
 Unfortunately, the emergence of new writing modes has relegated the pen to a more confidential status and to rarer uses.
 People now write messages on computer screens, without ever having to approach a pencil sharpener.
 One can only wonder what the keyboard will become when the next novelty arrives.
 The fission bomb works on the principle of: it transforms energy by assembling a nucleus of a myriad of protons and neutrons.
 A bit like if you were to make a cart climb a hill. By splitting the core again, and then releasing some of that energy.
 Some atoms have an unstable nucleus, so they tend to break apart with little or no pressure.
 The surface of the moon is made of rocks and dust. Its outer layer is called the crust.
 The thickness of the crust is about 70 km on the visible face and 100 km on the hidden face.
 It is thinner at sea level and thicker under the continents.
 There may be more maria on the near side because the crust is thinner. It was easier for the lava to rise to the surface.
 Content theories are centered on the search for what makes people feel good or what attracts them.
 These theories suggest that people have certain needs and/or desires that have been internalized as they matured into adulthood.
 These theories examine what drives some people to want the things they do and what in their environment drives them to do or not do certain things.
 Two popular content theories are Maslow's hierarchy of needs theory and Herzberg's two-factor theory.
 In general, two behaviors can emerge when a manager becomes the boss of former colleagues: one extreme being to try to remain "the good friend" (or the good friend).
 This type of manager has difficulty making unpopular decisions, taking disciplinary action, conducting evaluations, delegating responsibilities, and holding others accountable.
 At the other end of the spectrum, one transforms into an unrecognizable individual who feels that he/she must change everything the group has created so far and do things his/her own way.
 After all, the boss is ultimately responsible for the success and failure of the team.
 This behavior often leads to dissension between the leaders and the rest of the team.
 Virtual teams are subject to the same standards of excellence as conventional teams, but there are subtle differences.
 Members of a virtual team often function as the point of contact for their immediate physical group.
 They often have more autonomy than traditional team members because their teams can meet according to different time zones, which may not be understood by their local management.
 The presence of a real "invisible team" (Larson and LaFasto, 1989, p109) is also a unique element of a virtual team.
 The "invisible team" is the management team to which each member is accountable. It sets the standards for each of them.
 Why would an organization want to go through the tedious process of creating a learning structure? One of the goals of implementing organizational learning concepts is innovation.
 When all available resources are used effectively in the functional services of an organization, creativity and ingenuity can be fully expressed.
 Therefore, the process of an organization working together to overcome an obstacle can lead to a new innovative process to meet the customer need.
 Before an organization can be innovative, its management must create a culture of innovation, shared knowledge and its own learning culture.
 Angel (2006) presents the Continuum Approach as a method used to help organizations achieve better results.
 Neurobiological data provide material evidence for a theoretical approach to the study of cognition, thus allowing the field of research to be narrowed and made much more precise.
 The correlation between brain pathology and behavior supports scientists in their research.
 It has long been known that different types of brain damage, lesions, tumors and trauma affect behavior and cause changes in certain mental functions.
 The rise of new technologies allows us to see and study brain structures and processes never seen before.
 This gives us a lot of information and material to build simulation models that help us understand the processes in our mind.
 Although Artificial Intelligence is often strongly connoted science fiction, it represents a very important part of computer science that studies the behavior, learning and intelligent adaptation of a machine.
 Artificial intelligence research is aimed at automating tasks requiring intelligent approaches.
 Examples include control, planning and scheduling, the ability to respond to diagnostic and customer questions, and recognition of handwriting, voice and face.
 These practices led to distinct disciplines, focused on providing solutions to the problems of everyday life.
 AI systems are now often used in the fields of economics, medicine, engineering and the military, as they have been implemented in several home computer and video game software.
 Field trips are an integral part of any school class. Often, a teacher would like to take his or her students to places where a bus trip is not feasible.
 The solution is provided by technology in the form of virtual field trips. Students can view museum artifacts, visit an aquarium, or admire a beautiful work of art while sitting with their class.
 Participating in a virtual excursion is also a great way to think about a trip and share your experiences with future generations.
 For example, students at Bennet High School in North Carolina design a website each year about their visit to the state capital. Each year the site is updated, but the old versions are kept online to serve as an album.
 Blogs can also help students improve their writing skills. Even though students often try blogging with neglected grammar and spelling, the fact of having an audience usually makes them improve.
 As students are often the most critical audience, the blogger begins to strive to improve his writing to avoid criticism.
 In addition, blogging "forces students to better know the world around them." The need to generate public interest encourages students to be intelligent and interesting (Toto, 2004).
 Blogs are a tool that fosters collaboration and encourages students to extend their learning well beyond the traditional school day.
 "When used well, blogs ""can help students to strengthen their analytical and critical thinking skills: by actively responding to online content, they can compare their views with others and expose their own points of view on specific topics"" (Oravec, 2002)."
 Ottawa is the charming bilingual capital of Canada and has a large number of art galleries and museums that showcase Canada's past and present.
 Further south you will find the Niagara Falls and to the north, the Muskoka region and its surroundings that possess a pristine natural beauty.
 All these measures, and many more, make Ontario what foreigners consider to be the quintessence of Canada.
 Large areas further north are sparsely populated and some are almost uninhabited in a wild state.
 For a population comparison that surprises more than one: There are more African-Americans living in the United States than Canadian citizens.
 The islands of East Africa are located in the Indian Ocean, off the eastern coast of Africa.
 Madagascar is by far the largest country, and even a continent in itself, when it comes to fauna.
 Most of the smaller islands are independent nations, or associated with France, and are known for being luxury beach resorts.
 The Arabs also brought the practice of Islam to the islands and this religion has spread widely in the Comoros and Mayotte.
 European influence and colonialism began in the 15th century, when Portuguese explorer Vasco de Gama discovered the Cape route that connected Europe to India.
 In the north, the region is delimited by the Sahel, and in the south and west by the Atlantic Ocean.
 To women: It is recommended that any woman who travels should say that she is married, regardless of her marital status.
 It is also advisable to wear a wedding ring (which should not look too precious.
 Women must realize that some cultural differences can lead to behaviors that they consider harassment, such as being followed, grabbed by the arm, etc.
 Be firm in refusing advances from men, and do not be afraid to stand your ground (cultural differences or not, it does not mean that it is acceptable!)
 The modern city of Casablanca was founded by Berber fishermen in the 10th century BC, and was used by the Phoenicians, Romans and Merinides as a strategic port called Anfa.
 The Portuguese, who after destroying it had rebuilt and renamed it Casa Branca, finally abandoned it in 1755 after an earthquake.
 The Moroccan sultan rebuilt the city under the name Daru l-Badya, and it was renamed Casablanca by Spanish traders who established trading posts there.
 Casablanca is one of the least interesting places in all of Morocco for shopping.
 Around the old medina, you can easily find places to buy traditional Moroccan products, such as tagines, pottery, leather goods, hookahs and trinkets of all kinds, but that's all for tourists.
 Goma is a tourist town located in the extreme east of the Democratic Republic of the Congo, near Rwanda.
 In 2002, Goma was destroyed by the lava of the Nyiragongo volcano which buried most of the city's streets, particularly the downtown area.
 Although Goma is reasonably safe, any visit outside of Goma should be researched to understand the state of fighting that continues in the province of North Kivu.
 The city is also the starting point for the ascent of the Nyiragongo volcano as well as for treks to track the mountain gorillas among the least expensive in Africa.
 You can use boda-boda (motorcycle taxi) to get around in Goma. The normal (local) price is about 500 Congolese francs for a short ride.
 Combined with its relative inaccessibility, “Timbuktu” has become a metaphor for distant, exotic lands.
 Today, Timbuktu is a poor city, although its reputation makes it a tourist attraction, and it has an airport.
 In 1990, it was added to the list of World Heritage in Danger, due to the threat of desert sands.
 It was one of the main stops on Henry Louis Gates's PBS series "Wonders of the African World."
 The city contrasts strongly with the rest of the country, as it has a more Arabic than African style.
 The Kruger National Park (KNP) is located in the northeast of South Africa and borders the Mozambique to the east, Zimbabwe to the north and the Crocodile River to the south.
 The total area of the park is 19,500 km², which is divided into 14 ecozones, each with its own specific fauna.
 It is one of the most well-known amusement parks in South Africa and considered the flagship of South African National Parks (SANParks).
 As with all South African national parks, there are daily entrance and conservation fees for the park.
 It may be advantageous to purchase a Wild Card that gives access to certain South African parks, as well as all South African national parks.
 The island of Hong Kong gives its name to the territory of Hong Kong and represents the main center of interest for many tourists.
 The row of buildings that draws the horizon of Hong Kong has been compared to a sparkling bar graph, which is reflected in the waters of Victoria Harbour.
 To admire the most beautiful panoramas of Hong Kong, leave the island and join the waterfront of Kowloon located in front.
 The vast majority of urban development on Hong Kong Island is concentrated on the landfills of the north shore.
 This is the place that the British settlers invested in, so it seems like a good place to start if you are looking for evidence of the colonial past of this region.
 The Sundarbans are the largest coastal mangrove belt in the world, stretching 80 km (50 miles) from the coast to the Bangladeshi and Indian hinterland.
 The Sundarbans have been declared a UNESCO World Heritage Site. The part of the forest located on Indian territory is called the Sundarbans National Park.
 The forests are not, however, composed solely of mangrove swamps: they also contain some of the last remnants of the majestic jungles that once covered the Ganges plain.
 The Sundarbans cover an area of 3,850 km², of which about a third is covered by water/marshes.
 Sundarbans is a nature reserve since 1966, you can find there about 400 Royal Bengal tigers and 30 000 spotted deer.
 Buses leave from the inter-district bus station (located on the other side) throughout the day, but most, particularly those serving the east and Jakar/Bumthang, leave between 6:30 and 7:30 in the morning.
 Inter-district buses are often full, so it is advisable to buy a ticket a few days in advance.
 Most districts are served by small Japanese ferries, which are comfortable and sturdy.
 Collective taxis are a quick and comfortable way to get to nearby places such as Paro (150 Nu) and Punakha (200 Nu).
 The Oyapock Bridge is a cable-stayed bridge that spans the Oyapock River to connect the cities of Oiapoque in Brazil and Saint-Georges-de-l'Oyapock in French Guiana.
 The two towers rise to a height of 83 meters; it is 378 meters long and has two lanes of 3.50 meters wide.
 The vertical clearance under the bridge is 15 meters. The structure was completed in August 2011, but it was not opened to traffic until March 2017.
 The bridge is expected to be fully operational in September 2017, when Brazilian customs posts are expected to be completed.
 The Guaraní were the largest indigenous group living in what is now eastern Paraguay, living as semi-nomadic hunter-gatherers and also practicing subsistence agriculture.
 Other indigenous tribes that inhabited the Chaco, such as the Guaycurú or the Payaguá, survived mainly thanks to fishing, hunting, or gathering.
 In the 16th century, Paraguay, once called the "giant province of the Indies", was born from the encounter between Spanish conquerors and indigenous peoples.
 The Spanish inaugurated the period of colonization, which lasted three centuries.
 Since the foundation of Asunción in 1537, Paraguay has managed to preserve much of its indigenous character and identity.
 Argentina is known for having one of the best teams and some of the best polo players in the world.
 The biggest tournament of the year takes place in December on the polo fields of Las Cañitas.
 In addition, smaller tournaments and matches are sometimes organized here at other times of the year.
 For information on tournaments and places to buy tickets for polo matches, see the Asociacion Argentina de Polo.
 The official currency of the Falkland Islands is the Falkland Islands pound (FKP), which is equivalent to one pound sterling (GBP).
 Money can be exchanged at the only bank on the islands, located in Stanley, opposite the FIC West store.
 The pound sterling is a commonly accepted currency throughout the islands, while in Stanley, credit cards and US dollars are also often accepted.
 On the neighbouring islands, credit cards will probably not be accepted, even if British and American currencies may be. Talk to the owners in advance to agree on a method of payment.
 It is almost impossible to exchange Falkland Islands money outside the islands, so change it before leaving the islands.
 Montevideo being located south of the Equator, winter in the northern hemisphere corresponds to summer there and vice versa.
 Montevideo is located in a subtropical zone and summer temperatures exceeding 30 °C are common.
 Winter can be deceptively cold: temperatures rarely drop below freezing, but wind and humidity combine to make it feel colder than the thermometer says.
 There are not really any "rainy" and "dry" seasons: the rainfall is pretty much constant throughout the year.
 Although many of the park's animals are accustomed to seeing humans, they are still wild animals; please do not feed or disturb them.
 According to park authorities, you should stay at least 100 meters away from bears and wolves and 25 meters away from all other wild animals!
 As docile as they may appear, the bison, elk, moose, bear and almost all large animals can attack.
 Every year, dozens of visitors are injured because they don’t keep a safe distance. These animals are large, wild and potentially dangerous, so give them space.
 Also, be aware that odors attract bears and other wild animals, so avoid carrying or cooking odorous foods and keep the camp clean.
 Apia is the capital of Samoa. The city is located on the island of Upolu and has a population of just under 40,000.
 Apia was founded in the 1850s and has been the official capital of Samoa since 1959.
 The port was the site of a notorious naval standoff in 1889, when seven ships from Germany, the United States and Britain refused to leave the port.
 All ships were sunk, except for a British cruiser. Nearly 200 Americans and Germans lost their lives.
 The supreme chief Tupua Tamasese Lealofi III was assassinated during a peaceful rally in the city, during the independence struggle organized by the Mau movement.
 There are many beaches, as Auckland is on two harbours. The most popular are in three areas.
 The beaches of the North Shore (in the district of North Harbour) are on the Pacific Ocean and stretch from Long Bay in the north to Devonport in the south.
 Almost all beaches are sandy and safe for swimming, and most are shaded by pohutukawa trees.
 Tamaki Drive beaches are located on the Waitemata Harbour, in the chic suburbs of Mission Bay and St Heliers in central Auckland.
 These beaches, sometimes very popular with families, have many shops along the coastline. Swimming is safe.
 The main local beer is the "Number One", a fairly ordinary but tasty and refreshing beer. There is also another local beer, the "Manta".
 There are many French wines to taste, but New Zealand and Australian wines may travel better.
 You can drink the local tap water safely, but you can easily find bottled water if you have any concerns about it.
 For Australians, the idea of a "flat white" is foreign; a short black is an "espresso", the cappuccino is filled with cream (not foam) and tea is served without milk.
 Hot chocolate is in line with Belgian standards. Fruit juices are expensive but excellent.
 Many trips to the reef are made throughout the year, and injuries from one of these causes on the reef are rare.
 Nevertheless, follow the advice of the authorities, obey all the signs and pay special attention to the safety warnings.
 From October to April, north of 1770, box jellyfish arrive near beaches and river estuaries. They can also sometimes be seen outside of this period.
 Sharks do exist, but they rarely attack humans. Most of them are afraid of humans and would stay away.
 Saltwater crocodiles do not actively live in the ocean, their main habitat is in the estuaries of the rivers north of Rockhampton.
 Advance booking gives the traveller peace of mind in knowing that he or she will have a place to sleep once they arrive at their destination.
 Travel agencies often have agreements with specific hotels, but you can also book through travel agencies other types of accommodation, such as camping areas.
 Travel agencies usually offer packages that include breakfast, transportation to and from the airport, or even packages that combine the flight and accommodation.
 They can also hold the reservation for you if you need time to think about the offer or to get other documents you need for your destination (for example, a visa).
 Any modification or request must be addressed to the travel agency first and not directly to the hotel.
 At some music festivals, the vast majority of attendees decide to camp on site, and most consider it an integral part of the experience.
 If you want to participate closely to the musical event, you will have to arrive early to find a well-placed camping area.
 Remember that even if the music shows are over on the main stages, other music shows may continue until late at night in other festival venues.
 Some festivals have special camping areas for families with young children.
 If you cross the north of the Baltic Sea in winter, be sure to check the location of the cabin, because the crossing of the ice can cause unbearable noise at the level of the most exposed cabins.
 Saint Petersburg cruises include time spent in the city. Cruise passengers are exempt from the visa requirement (see conditions).
 Casinos generally make many efforts to maximize the time and money spent by customers. There are rarely windows and clocks, and exits can be difficult to find.
 They usually offer special deals on food, drinks and entertainment to keep guests happy and keep them on the premises.
 On some sites, it is the locals who offer free alcoholic beverages. Nevertheless, drunkenness impairs judgment, and all good players know that it is crucial to stay sober.
 Anyone driving to high altitudes or crossing mountain passes should consider the possibility of snow, ice or freezing temperatures.
 On icy and snow-covered roads, friction is low and you can't drive as if you were on bare asphalt.
 During blizzards, it can snow enough in a very short time to block you in.
 Visibility can also be limited by snow or sleet or by condensation or ice on vehicle windows.
 On the other hand, the presence of ice and snow is normal in many countries, and traffic is practically uninterrupted all year round.
 Safaris are perhaps the greatest tourist attraction in Africa and the most memorable moment for many visitors.
 In common parlance, the term safari refers to an excursion into the African wilderness, particularly the savannah, to witness the spectacle of wild animals in their natural environment.
 Some animals, such as elephants and giraffes, tend to approach cars closely and standard equipment allows them to be well observed.
 Lions, cheetahs and leopards are sometimes shy and you will see them better with binoculars.
 A walking safari (also called a bushwalk, footing or trek) is a hike, either for a few hours or for several days.
 The Paralympics will be held from August 24 to September 5, 2021. Some events will be held in other locations across Japan.
 Tokyo will be the only Asian city to have hosted two Summer Olympic Games, after hosting the Games in 1964.
 If you booked your flights and accommodation in 2020 before the announcement of the postponement, you may be faced with a difficult situation.
 Cancellation policies vary, but as of late March, most coronavirus-based cancellation policies do not extend past July 2020, the date the Olympics were scheduled to take place.
 It is expected that most event tickets will cost between 2,500 and 130,000 yen, with typical tickets costing around 7,000 yen.
 By ironing wet clothes, you can dry them more easily. Many hotels have an iron and ironing board that can be borrowed, even if there is not one in the room.
 If you don't have an iron or don't want to wear ironed socks, you can try using a hair dryer, if you have one.
 Avoid overheating the fabric (which can cause it to shrink or in extreme cases, burn).
 There are different methods of water purification, some of which are more effective against specific threats.
 In some places, it is enough to boil water for one minute; in others, it is necessary to boil it for several minutes.
 The effectiveness of filters varies, and if you have a problem, you should consider buying your water in a sealed bottle from a reputable company.
 Travellers may encounter pests that they are not familiar with in their home region.
 Parasites can contaminate food, cause irritation or, in the most serious cases, cause allergic reactions, spread venom or transmit infections.
 Infectious diseases themselves, or dangerous animals that can injure or kill people by force, are not usually considered parasites.
 In some locations, duty-free shops provide an opportunity to purchase goods exempt from taxes and excise duties.
 Travellers to countries with high taxes can sometimes save a lot of money, particularly on products such as alcohol and tobacco.
 The section between Point Marion and Fairmont has the most difficult driving conditions on the Buffalo-Pittsburgh highway, frequently passing through isolated back country.
 If you're not used to driving on country roads, keep an open mind: steep hills, narrow lanes and tight bends are the norm.
 The posted speed limits are significantly lower than in the previous and following sections – usually 35 to 40 mph (56-64 km/h) – and their strict compliance is even more important than before.
 In contrast, the mobile service is curiously much stronger here than in many other parts of the route, for example the Pennsylvania Wilds.
 German pastries are rather good, and in Bavaria, they are very rich and varied, similar to those of their southern neighbour, Austria.
 Fruit pies are common: apples are cooked and baked all year round, while cherries and plums make an appearance in the summer.
 Many German baked goods also contain almonds, hazelnuts and other nuts, and popular cakes often go particularly well with a cup of strong coffee.
 If you want small but hearty pastries, try the Berlin balls, also called Berliner, Pfannkuchen or Krapfen depending on the region.
 A curry is a dish made of herbs and spices, accompanied by meat or vegetables.
 A curry dish can be either "solid" or "liquid", depending on the amount of sauce it contains.
 In the northern interior regions of India and Pakistan, yogurt is commonly used in curries; in southern India and some other coastal regions of the subcontinent, coconut milk is commonly used.
 With 17,000 islands, Indonesian cuisine is a generic term covering a wide variety of regional cuisines present across the country.
 However, when this term is used without other qualification, it tends to refer to food from the central and eastern parts of the main island of Java.
 Now widely available throughout the archipelago, Javanese cuisine offers a range of simply seasoned dishes, the predominant flavours that Javanese people favour being peanuts, chillies, sugar (especially Javanese coconut sugar) and various aromatic spices.
 The stirrups are supports for the rider's feet, which hang on either side of the saddle.
 They offer greater stability to the user, but they can pose a safety problem: in fact, the user's feet can get stuck in them.
 If a rider is thrown from a horse but has a foot caught in the stirrup, he could be dragged if the horse runs away. To minimize this risk, a number of safety measures can be taken.
 First, most riders wear riding boots with a heel and a smooth sole and fairly narrow.
 Then, some saddles, especially English ones, have safety bars that allow a stirrup to fall from the saddle if it is pulled backwards by a rider who falls.
 Vallée de Cochamó – The destination of excellence for climbing in Chile, known as the Yosemite of South America, with many large granite walls and cliffs.
 From the peaks, the views of the mountains are unparalleled. Climbers from around the world are constantly discovering new routes on the slopes, where the possibilities are endless.
 Winter sports, such as skiing and snowboarding, are popular sports that involve sliding down a snow-covered slope with skis or a snowboard attached to the feet.
 Skiing is a major travel activity that has many aficionados, sometimes called "ski bums", who organize their entire vacations around skiing in specific locations.
 The idea of skiing is very old: cave paintings showing skiers date back to 5,000 years B.C.!
 The practice of alpine skiing as a sport goes back at least to the 17th century; the first recreational ski club was founded in 1861 in Australia by Norwegians.
 Ski hiking: this activity is also called Nordic skiing, cross-country skiing or hiking skiing.
 It resembles alpine touring skiing, as well as mountaineering, without generally incorporating these activities, which are practiced on rough terrain and require the use of much stiffer skis and boots.
 Think of the ski route as a similar hiking route.
 In good conditions, you can cover a little more distance than on foot – but you will rarely reach the speeds of cross-country skiing without a heavy backpack on groomed trails.
 Europe is a relatively small continent, but it is made up of many independent countries, so in normal circumstances, travelling through several countries means having to apply for several visas and undergo several passport checks.
 Schengen Area, however, works a little like a single country in this regard.
 As long as you stay in this zone, you can usually cross borders without going through passport control points.
 Likewise, having a Schengen visa, you do not need to separately apply for a visa for each of the member countries of the area, which saves time, money and administrative procedures.
 There is no universal definition of what constitutes an antique. Some tax authorities define antiques as goods over 100 years old.
 The criteria vary according to the place where one is located; in some parts of the world, such as North America, the age limit may be lower than that in force in Europe.
 Handmade products can be considered antiques even if they are less old than similar industrial products.
 Reindeer herding is an important livelihood for the Sami and the culture surrounding the trade is of great importance to many other professions.
 Although, according to tradition, not all Sami were involved in large-scale reindeer herding, they lived off fishing, hunting and other similar activities, while using reindeer primarily as draft animals.
 Nowadays, many Sámi people have modern jobs. Tourism is an important source of income in Lapland, the Sámi region.
 Although very widely used, particularly among non-Roms, the term “Gypsy” is often considered pejorative due to its association with negative stereotypes and a distorted image of the Roma people.
 If the country you are travelling to is the subject of a travel advisory issued by your government, your travel insurance or your travel cancellation insurance may be affected.
 You can also seek advice from other governments, but their advice is tailored to their citizens.
 As an example, American citizens in the Middle East may face different situations than Europeans or Arabs.
 Opinions are only a brief summary of a country's political situation.
 The opinions presented are often superficial, general and overly simplified compared to the more detailed information available elsewhere.
 Severe weather is the generic term for any dangerous weather phenomenon that can cause damage, serious social disruption, or loss of life.
 Severe weather can occur anywhere in the world, and it can be of many types, depending on geographic, topographic, and atmospheric features.
 High winds, hail, excessive rainfall and wildfires are forms and effects of severe weather, as are thunderstorms, tornadoes, waterspouts and hurricanes.
 Extreme weather events, regional and seasonal, include cold outbreaks, blizzards with high winds, and dust or sand storms.
 It is strongly recommended that travellers research the risks of bad weather that may affect their destination area, as this may have an impact on the itineraries they are considering.
 Anyone considering travelling to a country that could be considered a war zone should receive professional training.
 A search on the internet for "Courses in hostile environments" will probably provide the address of a local company.
 A course will normally cover all the issues discussed here in much more detail, usually with practical experience.
 Training normally lasts from 2 to 5 days and includes role-playing, a lot of first aid, and sometimes weapons training.
 Books and magazines dealing with survival in the wilderness are common, but publications dealing with war zones are few.
 Travellers planning to have sex-change surgery abroad should ensure that they have valid travel documents for their return journey.
 Governments' willingness to issue passports with an unspecified gender (X) or to update documents to match the desired name and gender varies.
 The willingness of foreign governments to honour these documents is equally variable.
 Searches at security checkpoints have also become much more intrusive in the post-September 11 era.
 Transgender people in the pre-operative phase should not expect to pass scanners while maintaining their privacy and dignity.
 The rip currents are the currents that return from the waves that break on the beach, often on a reef or equivalent.
 Due to the submarine topography, the return flow is concentrated on a few deeper sections, and a rapid current to the deep water can form there.
 In most cases, death is due to exhaustion from attempting to swim against the current, which can be impossible.
 As soon as you get out of the current, the return to swimming is not more difficult than usual.
 Try to aim for somewhere where you will not be caught again. It is also possible, depending on your skills and whether you have been spotted or not, that you may want to wait for help.
 The re-entry shock occurs earlier than the cultural shock (the honeymoon phase is shorter), lasts longer and can be more severe.
 Travelers who have had difficulty adjusting to the new culture sometimes have a lot of trouble adjusting to their home culture.
 When you return home after living abroad, you have already adapted to the new culture and have lost some of the habits of your home culture.
 At first, when you went abroad, people were probably patient and understanding, knowing that travelers in a new country have to adjust.
 People may not anticipate that patience and understanding are also needed for travelers returning home.
 The sound and light show at the pyramid is one of the most interesting attractions in the area for children.
 You can see the pyramids in the dark and you can see them in silence before the show starts.
 Usually, you can always hear the noise of tourists and vendors. The history of sound and light is like a history book.
 The Sphinx is placed as the backdrop and narrator of a long story.
 The scenes are displayed on the pyramids and the different pyramids are lit.
 The South Shetland Islands, discovered in 1819, are claimed by several nations and have the largest number of research stations and sixteen of them are active in 2020.
 The archipelago is located 120 km north of the peninsula. The island of King George, with the village of Villa Las Estrellas, is the largest.
 Other examples: the island of Livingston and Deception, where the flooded caldera of an active volcano offers a spectacular natural harbor.
 Ellsworth Land is the southern region of the peninsula, bounded by the Bellingshausen Sea.
 The mountains of the peninsula merge into the plateau, then reappear to form the Ellsworth Mountains, 360 km long and crossed by the Minnesota Glacier.
 The northern part, or Sentinel Range, contains the highest mountains in Antarctica, the Vinson Massif, which rises to 4,892 m.
 In remote areas without cellular coverage, you may have no choice but to use satellite telephony.
 A satellite phone usually does not replace a cell phone, because you have to be outside and have a clear view of the satellite to make a call.
 It is a service often used by shipping, including pleasure craft, as well as by expeditions that have remote data transmission and telephone needs.
 Your local telephone operator should be able to tell you more about connecting to this service.
 Those planning a gap year have the opportunity to learn while travelling, and more and more of them are choosing this option.
 This formula is particularly appreciated by young people leaving school, as it allows them to take a year off before university, without compromising their studies.
 Often, having taken a gap year abroad can actually give you better chances of doing further studies in your home country.
 In general, there is a fee to take these educational programs.
 Finland is a popular destination for boating. The “Land of a thousand lakes” also has thousands of islands, in the lakes and in the coastal archipelagos.
 You don't necessarily need a yacht in the archipelago and on the lakes.
 While the coastal archipelagos and the larger lakes are indeed large enough for a yacht, smaller boats or even a kayak offer a different experience.
 Recreational boating is a national pastime in Finland, with one boat for every seven or eight people.
 Norway, Sweden and New Zealand are in the same situation, but apart from that, it is a unique case (in the Netherlands, for example, the figure is one to forty).
 Most cruises on the Baltic Sea feature an extended stay in St. Petersburg, Russia.
 This means that you can visit the historic city for a few full days while returning to sleep on the boat at night.
 If you only go to land with cruise excursions, you will not need a separate visa (as of 2009).
 The city of Berlin, Germany, is mentioned in some brochures for cruises. As you can see by consulting the map above, Berlin is not at all near the sea and no visit to this city is included in the price of the cruise.
 Flying can be a frightening experience for people of all ages and backgrounds, especially if they have never flown before or have experienced a traumatic event.
 There is no need to be ashamed of it: it is no different from the fears and anxieties that many people feel about other things.
 For some, understanding something about how planes work and what happens during a flight can help to overcome a fear that is based on the unknown or on not having control.
 Transport companies are well paid to make fast deliveries. Often, in the case of an urgent repair, the question of time is crucial for the documents, goods or spare parts involved.
 On some routes, large companies have their own planes, but on other routes and for small companies, there has been a problem.
 If they had sent the goods by air freight, on some routes, it would have taken days to pass the unloading and customs.
 The only way to get it there faster was to send it as checked baggage. Airline regulations will not allow them to send a bag without a passenger, and that is where you come in.
 The most obvious way to travel first class or business class is to shell out a lot of money for that privilege (or, better yet, have your company do it for you).
 However, it is not cheap: as a rule, you can expect to pay up to four times the normal economy fare for business class, and eleven times for first class!
 In general, it is useless to try to get discounts for business class or first class seats on direct flights from A to B.
 Airlines know very well that they can count on a certain type of traveller who is willing to pay a high price for the privileges of speed and comfort, and they set their fares accordingly.
 The capital of Moldova is Chisinau. The local language is Romanian, but Russian is very widespread.
 Moldova is a multi-ethnic republic that suffers from ethnic conflicts.
 In 1994, this conflict led to the creation of the self-proclaimed republic of Transnistria in eastern Moldova, with its own government and currency, but recognized by no United Nations member state.
 Economic ties have been re-established between these two parts of Moldova despite the failure of political negotiations.
 The main religion in Moldova is Orthodox Christianity.
 With a population of 3.7 million, Izmir is Turkey's third largest city, the second port after Istanbul, and an excellent hub.
 What was the ancient city of Smyrna is now a modern, developed and vibrant commercial centre, set around a huge bay, surrounded by mountains.
 The wide boulevards, glass buildings and modern shopping centers are dotted with traditional red-tiled roofs, the 18th century market, and old mosques and churches, although the city has an atmosphere that is more Mediterranean than traditional Turkey.
 The village of Haldarsvík offers views of the neighboring island of Eysturoy and is home to an unusual octagonal church.
 In the cemetery, there are interesting marble sculptures representing doves on some tombs.
 It is worth walking for half an hour in this fascinating village.
 The romantic and fascinating city of Sintra, located to the north, is easily accessible and has been made famous among foreigners by the vivid account of its splendor given by Lord Byron.
 Scotturb bus 403 regularly goes to Sintra, with a stop at Cabo da Roca.
 On your way north, be sure to visit the beautiful sanctuary of Our Lady of Fatima (temple), a world-famous site for the apparitions of Mary.
 Remember that you are essentially visiting a cemetery, and a site that has almost incalculable meaning for a large portion of the world's population.
 There are still many women and men alive who survived their stay here, and many others who saw their loved ones murdered or killed by forced labour, Jews or non-Jews indifferently.
 Please treat the site with all the dignity, solemnity and respect it deserves. Do not make jokes about the Holocaust or Nazis.
 Do not deface the site by marking or scratching graffiti on the structures.
 The official languages of Barcelona are Catalan and Spanish. About half of the inhabitants prefer to speak Catalan, a large majority understand it, and practically everyone is able to speak Spanish.
 However, most of the signs are only in Catalan, as the law establishes that it is the first official language.
 Yet Spanish is also widely used in public transport and other facilities.
 Regular announcements in the metro are made only in Catalan, but unscheduled disruptions are announced by an automated system in many languages, including Spanish, English, French, Arabic and Japanese.
 Parisians have a reputation for being self-centered, rude and arrogant.
 Although this stereotype is often inaccurate, the best way to get along in Paris is to behave as well as possible, to act like a well-bred person. This will make your travels much easier.
 The abrupt outdoors of Parisians evaporate quickly if you show a minimum of courtesy.
 The Plitvice Lakes National Park is densely wooded, mainly with beech, fir and spruce, and has a mixture of alpine and Mediterranean vegetation.
 The country has a great variety of plant communities due to the diversity of its microclimates, soils and altitudes.
 The region is also home to a very large variety of animal and bird species.
 Rare animals such as the European brown bear, the wolf, the eagle, the owl, the lynx, the wild cat and the great tahr can be seen there, as well as many other common species.
 When visiting a monastery, women must wear skirts covering their knees and have their shoulders covered.
 Most monasteries provide stoles to women who arrive with nothing, but if you bring yours, and it is brightly colored, you will get a smile from the monk or nun at the entrance.
 As well as men must wear pants covering the knees.
 You can also borrow this clothing from the stock at the entrance, but since it is not washed after each use, you may not feel comfortable wearing these skirts. One size fits all for men!
 Majorcan cuisine, like that of similar areas of the Mediterranean, is based on bread, vegetables and meat (especially pork), and uses olive oil.
 A simple and popular dinner, especially in the summer, is Pa amb Oli: bread with olive oil, tomato and any condiments available, such as cheese, tuna, etc.
 All names, followed by the word Sie, which means you, always begin with a capital letter, even in the middle of a sentence.
 This is a great way to distinguish between certain verbs and objects.
 It can also be said to facilitate reading, although the writing is somewhat complicated by the need to know whether a verb or adjective is used in a noun form.
 Pronunciation is relatively easy in Italian, as most words are pronounced exactly as they are written.
 The main letters to watch out for are c and g, as their pronunciation varies depending on the following vowel.
 Please also make sure to pronounce “r” and “rr” in a distinct way: “caro” means “cherry,” while “carro” means “car.”
 Persian has a relatively easy grammar and is mostly regular.
 Therefore, reading this introduction to grammar would help you learn a lot about Persian grammar and better understand the sentences.
 It goes without saying that if you know a Romance language, it will be easier for you to learn Portuguese.
 However, those who speak some Spanish might conclude hastily that Portuguese is close enough that it is not necessary to study it separately.
 Pre-modern observatories are generally obsolete today, and remain in place as museums or education sites.
 As light pollution at their time was not as preoccupying as it is today, they are generally located in cities or on campuses, more accessible than those built in the modern era.
 Most modern research telescopes are enormous infrastructures placed in remote regions where atmospheric conditions are favorable.
 The contemplation of cherry blossoms, known as hanami, has been a part of Japanese culture since the 8th century.
 The concept came from China where the plum blossom was the flower of choice.
 In Japan, the first cherry blossom festivals were organized by the emperor for himself and other members of the close aristocracy around the Imperial Court.
 Plants look their best when they are in a natural environment, so resist the temptation to remove even just one.
 If you visit a strictly manicured garden, the collection of "specimens" will also get you kicked out without discussion.
 Singapore is generally considered to be an extremely safe place, where it is very easy to get around, and where you can buy almost anything you need once you arrive.
 But, located in the "high tropics" only a few degrees north of the equator, you will have to adapt to the heat (always) and to a strong radiation of the sun (when the sky is clear, which is more rare).
 There are also a few buses that go north to Hebron, the traditional burial place of the biblical patriarchs Abraham, Isaac, and Jacob and their wives.
 Make sure the bus you are considering takes you to Hebron and not just to the nearby Jewish settlement of Kiryat Arba.
 Inland waterways can be an excellent theme for a holiday.
 For example, visiting castles in the Loire Valley, the Rhine Valley or taking a cruise to interesting sites on the Danube or boating along the Erie Canal.
 They also define the routes for popular hiking trails and bicycle paths.
 Christmas is one of the most important holidays of Christianity, it celebrates the birth of Jesus.
 Many traditions associated with these holidays have also been adopted by non-believers in Christian countries and by non-Christians around the world.
 It is traditional to spend Easter night awake in an open place to see the sunrise.
 There are of course Christian theological explanations for this tradition, but it may well be a pre-Christian ritual of spring and fertility.
 The more traditional churches often hold a Paschal Vigil on Saturday night during the Easter weekend, with congregations often bursting into the party at midnight to celebrate the resurrection of Christ.
 All animals that have arrived on these islands have done so originally by water, either swimming or on floating objects, or by air.
 Due to the great distance that separates them from the continent, mammals were unable to make the journey, making the giant tortoise the main grazing animal of the Galapagos.
 Since humans arrived in the Galapagos, many mammals have been introduced, including goats, horses, cows, rats, cats and dogs.
 If you visit the Arctic or Antarctic regions in winter, you may experience polar night, during which the sun does not rise above the horizon.
 This is a good opportunity to admire the aurora borealis, as the sky will be dark almost all day.
 As the regions are sparsely populated, and light pollution is therefore often not a problem, you can also enjoy the stars.
 The Japanese work culture is more hierarchical and formal than what Westerners may be used to.
 The costumes are classic work clothes, and employees are called by their family name or by their job title.
 Harmony in the workplace is crucial, as it emphasizes the collective effort rather than praising individual achievements.
 Workers must often get approval from their superiors for any decision they make and are expected to obey their superiors' instructions without question.
Results bleu: {'bleu': 0.45923528150396925, 'precisions': [0.7324788010254387, 0.5196976543564885, 0.39085337105139084, 0.2989381244679421], 'brevity_penalty': 1.0, 'length_ratio': 1.0256462117228267, 'translation_length': 25355, 'reference_length': 24721} results chrF: {'score': 69.55750348855013, 'char_order': 6, 'word_order': 0, 'beta': 2}